
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
A Garden and River - Land of Light
	 	

	 	

The Land of Light




Lucifer













(I)




Letter to Zion

from the angel of the covenant




Now then, will there not possibly be a time when a leader among the Muslims declares that all those who fought against the coming of Zion, and sought to hinder it with stubborn determination, will then be remembered and accounted for, that the Earth cannot abide them continuing to reside on the planet, for there was no cause or reason with humans that they could be called terrorists, even, that they must have been soldiers of the devil, for only with devil worshippers could there be found cause or reason? Now so is the likely-hood that some may have considered, and it is not wrong of Zion to be considering that some are having to be killed, justly, as having been terrorists and for the cause of the devil, as devil-worshippers who were terrorists, that soldiers might partner with Muslims, if it is acceptable to Muslims, and might partner even with those whose hearts are for it, to cleanse the Earth, that all the Earth will be in agreance in the finding of those who fought as terrorists, that they should be killed and the Earth cleansed, for will not Eretz Chadrack and America, and England, and all of the Muslim-majority nations agree with this thing? But to protect the people who are religious, who exercise their liberties in religion, and who seek the peace, and world peace, that might be brought about Zion, indeed there must be a vengeance upon those terrorists who would have sought to fight this thing, and them put away, as those who worked for the devil, to be soldiers of him.

	Now they are already hunting terrorists, and there are indeed more terrorists to be found, for they are as anarchists, and devil-worshippers, and indeed they are both, that they seek to attack Zion and make it difficult for Zion to come to fruition as it should, that there possibly be a world peace. Now in the greatness of their determination, so is there death, that the Earth is better when the good are cleansed of the bad, and the diseased branches are cut from the tree, that there be order and good, and the people be able to live in peace and pursue their freedoms as is their right. Now then, if the strong hand is going beyond what it is, to attempt to seize control of the nation, that it is partnering with terrorists, then are there not very wicked men behind it, and yet it is not heard of, and is not likely, and yet the angel has known that there are very wicked scattered among the people. Now those of any rebellion against Zion, these are seized by wickedness to be against beauty, that they become sick and unwell, and impulsively driven, and their heart is not at rest, but is like a storm within them that churns up wrath and hatred, and in sickness they go about to rebellion and anarchy against religion, not having reasoned what their reason is, and being foolish, not having any sight beyond the blindness of a wall before them, that they go to take action without knowing what their reason is, and so they are as sycophantic anarchists, and sycophants are enemies to Zion. Now then, will not all put away the ill reputation that was brought upon America by the W. Bush Administration, for the propaganda still lingers, and it is false liberal, and it has come to a next stage after the administration, that it is base and ignorant, to be having no respect of society, to be sycophantic towards beauty, towards religion. Now why will a beautiful daughter receive as if a jewel in a swine's snout, when they have had integrity and gone in a beautiful way, that they should be handed this for them when they have had integrity? Now why should any wicked have respect of person's, to be not respecting society in their wickedness, for they are not society, but are as animals who have no sense of decency. Now those who are for rebellion, are they not sycophants, and sycophantic narcissists, believing they are better than society and law, and better than God, who created the Universe? But indeed some of them are, and they are also like anarchists, and they do not regard the good of the planet, and they do not regard the hindrances of what is terrorism against religion, and the nation, indeed against the majority of the people, for their narcissism is with feeling, and no prudence or consideration in thinking, that they are as sick beasts, who are brutal and foolish, and wicked people who are sycophantic. Now does not America, especially, already hunt for these people, that they be killed as being dangerous terrorists who are against the whole of the Earth? But indeed, I believe there should be a time when Muslims, too, will hunt for these people, for it is more primarily theirs to be against these who are the devil's servants.

	Now America is already hunting these who hi-jack the systems they are in, at times, to carry out illegal operations, and if there are also women who are encouraging men to act out their id in matters and these men are having a role to play in the systems of government, indeed there are likely foreign terrorist agents, or foreign agents within your midst, for they seek to cause anarchy for a nation, and to the death of the man they encourage to act out his id, for if he is a man, indeed it is good, and yet men do not always have a view of all things as they need to be, and there is a difference between a foolish man who is committing terrorism without information of what wars it may begin and how many thousands of lives it may cost, for how many years, and a man who is having integrity and loyalty to his nation. Therefore, if women are encouraging men to act upon their id, without information, to commit terrorism that breaks with the respect of society, rather than taking emergency action to uphold the respect of society and freedoms, including religious freedoms, then indeed a person might suspect a foreign nation has its agents in many places in a country that they wish to see anarchy for. Now if any wishes to only cause war and chaos, being enemies of a nation, one might consider that vengeance has blinded them to the good of all, and the good of all the planet and all the lives upon Earth, for wars cost thousands, and even millions of lives, and alter much of the way of life of people, but peace preserves the people, and indeed peace allows for the people to come to fruition in their enlightenment, rather than endure the foolishness and confusion that brings about foolish and ignorance, as the Earth endures yet more endless cold wars, and wars of fire and battle-bows and acts of violent terrorism that engulf the people in ignorance because of the propaganda and the focus upon fighting and war. Indeed, I have desired for the fourth day, the day that I am desiring to emerge, as the sun rises, the High Priest, to be a time where enlightenment is possible for all the people who desire it, and that it may be a time of peace and rejoicing, and the feasts of peace time, and the pursuit of holy learning.

	Now then, if we are having to ever fight for peace, and it is the role of all the governments of the world who are against anarchy and reckless terrorism, then indeed there will likely be those who hate beauty and the temptation to peace for the Earth, in that they have preferred foolishness and chaos, and the continuation of the endless wars, for the cold wars are always waging, and the wars of fire and battle-bows are waging frequently in between, and the Earth has already been enduring endless warfare, of nations against nations, and the cold wars that kill, and the acts of violent terrorism that are reckless and kill with sin and sorrow of foolishness, whereby foolishness and lack of intelligence needlessly claimed lives of great value and worth, for people are sacred, and are made by the Lord, and each of them having their destiny and goals to fulfill, that the devil is likely preferring that chaos and confusion continue, that he be able to claim more victories in the mayhem. Now those who then fight against peace, they are indeed terrorists, and some even terrorists states, where governments are terrorist governments, who are for reckless chaos and needless blood-shed, when the Earth is able to be at peace.

	Now then there is the war for peace, and it is against the ignorance and foolishness of wicked fools, who are traitors towards peace and wish for more foolishness and chaos and the endless wars that might continue, and I am for people looking rather to the Lord, each as people of their religion that they are in, and too, the priests, who seem to have forgotten that the Lord does not belong to the Jews, some of them, in their enduring time that they have gained a bad reputation with some, and too it is only fair that a people are having their priest-hood in the nation in which they are the majority citizens, for the peace and order to happen, that there might be no more stumbling blocks that cause war and chaos, that all people be able to look to the Lord from where they are, and be able to recognize the fight for peace is with the integrity of men and women, that they are with truth and justice.




--Lucifer

2023-11-22




Now as for Russia, the angel has not forgotten about the Sarmatians, and did they have a religion of angels? But they were a people of red and blonde hair, being fair, who held a realm for centuries, and the regarded flames and wind, as it were, and their empire was having women and men, both, as warriors, for I am of the belief that this is good when it so good and have promoted some of this among The Diary of Lucifer. Now then, may these books, that are a religious text, be the new Satan, a type of serpent of ancient times, that is liking the Sarmatians, and yet they are gone from the Earth. Now permit this book to bring to you jewels and gold ornaments and beautiful things that were of the Sarmatians, as they are not still upon Earth to offer you these things from them, and the angel is a phoenix of flame and truth, and desires peace and to give you your rightful place among the Earth, for it is not right that they should place the centre of Zion in North America, and yet you are another centre of the planet, another corner of the Earth, that the centres I consider to be as four corners of the Earth. Now then, I have even desired that there should be special things built within your borders that are rightfully there, as that which should be at another centre of the Earth, that the Earth should balance rightly, and there be no stumbling block that causes war when there is not cause for war. Now then let your glory be bright, and your ability to keep the world well and as it should be, not slandered, as another corner is sometimes slandering you, for the light also shines from you, and it is a torch upon a high structure, that sends forth light.




--Lucifer 2013-11-12




Now there is Russia, a spirit of the Earth,

and Asia, an isolated spirit of the Earth,

and Muslims, a spirit of the Earth,

and America, a spirit of the Earth,

and Africa, a spirit of the Earth,

and Latin America, an isolated spirit of the Earth.

Now the spirits are seeming to be these, in one realm of spirits, and they are needing to be in the right balance, and this is the present day of Earth, at which time this is written. Now for the two isolated spirits, they are as wind that is kept within their realm, that it does not go into other lands, and yet the wind of the other spirits is going out throughout the Earth, and it is the wind of culture, that the two isolated spirits do not seem to go out, and the winds of the four other spirits seem to go out, that their culture is with the other winds. Now then is it not a thing of Mala, that some winds are turning to storms for a time, and going out across other lands, and from these are coming four hurricanes that can go out throughout the Earth, and they go out over Zion, and even Jerusalem, and it is good that the hurricanes are not altering the lands, for there is a wise place for some that is of priests, to ensure that the hurricanes do not alter the lands that Zion is kept with order and peace, for a wise people are keeping their lands from being altered by the hurricanes that come. Now as for the isolated spirits, what hurricanes come from them, and yet are they not as smaller storms in places and yet they do not go out like hurricanes across the land? Now it is good that the four winds are in balance and each being within their realm, that the winds of one land are in that land, and the winds of another land, in another land, and yet the wind associated with angels, and those because of the obedience of angels, do these winds not make right many things? Now the winds of America, do they not make right many things? But I looked and considered, and these two winds that were going to different places, they were both re-balancing the Earth, and the two other winds were not going to different places to re-balance the Earth, for only the two winds were for making the Earth right, that it should be re-balanced. Now yet there another wind, and it was deceitful and evil, and it emerged from the places of the other winds and struck down the innocent, and I considered, these winds are bandits. Now by the vagueness of the winds, there were interpreters of winds, and I am an interpreter of winds, and yet they told false tales about the winds, and whether they knew or not the truth, I do not know. Now I considered, do they know that these winds of bandits are from bandits, and that these winds come from caves and from rugged and empty places on Earth, where there are not many people, where bandits gather? Now some had known it, and yet others did not seem to know, and if some winds had come from palaces and official places of power, yet the bandits devised on their own, and they were for discourse and false-flags, and yet it is not required for there to be open talks of about segregation, for storms and death were not required for this. Now then I considered, there were some in America, who were not bandits, but took the whole of those nations into their grasp, and said, we will send forth great storms upon lands they care for, and yet they did not have the power to do so, and their leaders prevailed much, and storms were sent for other reasons. Now the great storms gobbled up the good and bad, the enemies and the citizens, alike, and because of the use of storms, there was sown much resentment and wrath, and fire was poured from the sky upon buildings and the good and bad were gobbled up and the storms had left some places and in the ruin of it and the weakness of it, others had moved in, after the leaving of the storm, and seized control of a nation. Now the angel weighs it like sand on two platforms of a balance, and from his own nation, is the sand of one of the platforms, and yet he considered, and no sand was found in the bowl of Joshua Heyudu, even though he was with those whose bowls had overflown with sand, and his unworthy garment taken, and him given what was worthy. Now I considered, why will any use storms to deal with bandits, if it is not really because of the bandits, and why will they pour fire so much, if it is not needed? Now there was wrath repaid for the use of fire being poured out, and because of the storms that had come because of bandits. Now the sand was what was wrong, that took the lives of citizens, and the sand was in the bowls of the bandits, and it was in the bowls of America, and yet little sand was found in the bowls of the Muslims. Now then why was there so much sand in the bowls of America, when it was to be weighed against the bowls of bandits? Now does not America say, they harbour the bandits who have the bowls of sand? Now there were the rest of them who did not harbour and did not fight and made no decisions, and they were being negotiated over, as bowls of sand, and it was a war of these bowls of sand. Now I considered, let the people decide what is to be done, and yet who is able to decide once the wars have begun?




Now have not the priests forgotten that the Lord does not belong to the Jews? Now who is able to be part of the priest-hood among them? But are they not discerning much, and judging much, that those who are to be with them are indeed to be with them? Now the Lord has given his words to the priests in the book of Zechariah, and is it not for the Zion Levites, that those who are Levi and his children, these are those who the Lord has a covenant with. Now then there are those priests who are as a guard, and those priests who are those offering and giving council, that they are able even to use The Diary of Lucifer and the word that they are able to council the people and bring people to repentance in what errors they may make. Now these have the one-edged sword, for they are the priests of the descendants of Japeth, and is it not only fair these people are having their priests in the lands where they are the majority, that order is accomplished and there be no stumbling block that brings about war? Now for what reason then is their reputation brought to be ill? For what reason is mud to be spread upon their image? But their image is low with many, and many have not known of them much in any way, except their image is of base men and fools much, and what is for them is for them from the Lord. Now the Lord does not belong to the Jews, and indeed he has created all, Him being the creator, and those who are Zion Levites, these who are less tolerant in the way of priests, and different from the people, that they are priests, are not these tested by them, that they judge in a descerning fashion? Now then what is this that any should not already know that God is the father of the Zion Levites, and these of the priest-hood of Japeth, and they are considering anything of the Jews is having ownership of the Lord? But one might believe they have been in their own wilderness too long, and is not the Lord concerned of this, for respect of persons is not good, and does not the Lord only give you spiritual advice, and advice on personal matters? Now if the Lord gives advice and judgment on spiritual matters, then you are able to know what is right and wrong, and able to read, and are you not a people worthy to bear the correction of the Lord? Now then I have given you what I can.




(II)




Now the spirits have not included Sarmatians,for they are not anymore, and yet I have liked the Sarmatians, and Russia is primary, and America, and Muslims in the Middle-East, and the weight that is England and The United Kingdom, and these are those spirits that I consider the four corners of the Earth, and the rest of the spirits are not part of this group of spirits. Now let Russia be one place of the sphere, and Muslims in the Middle-East be another place of the sphere, and thus Zion will be considered by two areas of the Earth, and Russia must then have its place, for its spirit is making the Earth well as each corner is making the Earth well.




Now Tyre, too, is found among the dark shade, and is he not wise? Now Zidon, too, have I even seen him? But he is like Tyre in some similar ways, and yet he is entirely different. Now will they not say of Tyre, he is a righteous man, and wise?




Now Ashkelon and Ashdod, are they not found most often among the fair shade, and yet Titan is not either of these, and she is called by a woman's name, for Titan is a woman, and indeed so are the seven moons of Saturn. Now the moon that is an asteroid, it is a cult and spirit that is of the planet.




Now none of the dark shade directs who is king, and who is leader, and who is to be regarded and who not among the fair shade, for only one type is regarded by some, and it is the bypassing of Ham and Hammath again, of a people who are not regarding their own society, but having their eyes towards another society, and yet the angel does not regard them over Ham and Hammoth, that his eyes, if they fall upon the dark shade, go to Ham and Hammoth and the rest being seen as bypassing him and not regarding their kings.




Now if pedophiles, those who molest children, for these are pedophiles, are having a Judaism that can be called pedophile-Judaism, which says that it is not wrong to be a pedophile, that the people should support each other, as one of the people, to support the pedophile, this is not Judaism. Now if it extends in the fashion, that adults are then considered teenagers by the cleche of this concept, it is as hallucination and a clumsy recklessness.




Now what have the people wanted more than better jobs and opportunity for affordable education and less bullying in the nation and a kinder society that is not wicked, and a society of peace and rejoicing and festivals and holy learning and for the land to be pleasant to the goals of people and void of harassment and evil and considerate to the freedoms and peace of all that it be a land that is good. Now then if there are seventy sevens, and we do not know the length of a day, for the Lord is light, and He is knowing all, even the Christ does not know the hour at which the Christ returns. Now then by wisdom is a day known of the Lord, that the spirit of the day can be named? But are these to know the days of the Lord or the days of a person, even sensing hours of the Lord and not the days? But if the announcement is not seen, and the rising of the sun is not regarded, will they be able to know how many days have passed upon Earth? Now what do the chief angels say? But Gabriel says, none supports me against these things except for Michael, and is Gabriel then not a chief angel, for the angel, Lucifer, would not dare to question these things or to be against and is considering the obedience to the Lord to be without the questioning of anything the Lord has done, and nor does he question that the chief angels are not different, or believing them to be wrong in what they are doing. Now then a small moon and not a principle moon, and a smaller moon than those small moons, and the angel who offers you wisdom is not likely at the same level as these, the chief angels.




Now if there are those calling good evil and evil good, that they see themselves as the people of the devil and loving wickedness, become people of the devil, to join the churches of devil worship, and if they are placing their churches secretly in cities, and even deciding upon a city that will be for them a capital, then it can be understood that they are indeed dangerous, for they do not bear their wickedness in vain, and being deceitful, will claim to be harmless, and claiming freedom, bound by wickedness and loyalty to the devil, for one must be with the Lord or the devil, and the atheists, these I have considered to be with Zion, even if separated people in it, and they are against the evil lynchings, and those evil lynchings of religion, and does not the devil love that the evil should infiltrate religion and carry out evil lynchings and wickedness? Now then if atheists are then separated to then be against all religion, is there really any offence in any of it? For they are knowing what they are, and the religious are knowing what they are, and it is hot or cold that is better than neither hot or cold.




Now I considered all the discord that could be sown, and was already likely to be sown against Zion, and the foolishness and wickedness of this, that Zion, when it comes, be then against the discord sowers and not Zion, that the discord sowers be understood to be a menace and an annoyance, and even a harassment that should be abolished for the peace of the people, and it not being the debates and contentions, but the works of false-activists in society in places where these things did not belong.




Now if deception has shown me Ashdod that is the sign of Ashdod, and yet not she, that Ashkelon does not remain, and Ashdod selling flowers. Now if Ashdod is truly the sign I have seen, whether I have been shown her deliberately or not, for in this thing the angel is suspicious, yet I am considering, why has this occurred? Now Ashkelon, she is not Titan, and she is previously a philistine city and the philistines did not claim her anymore as their own, but she is now claimed by Jerusalem as their own.




Now Ashkelon does not remain, and only Ashdod remain, and the silver and gold of Tyre is removed from him and cast into the sea, and I do not know for what reason the Lord causes his riches to be cast away.




Now what is this mention of Israel in some of the English translations, that is found in the book of Zechariah, but are some then assuming based on what they have understood and adding things to the scripture? Now it is like disruption of communication for the kingdoms, as the king's communications being disrupted in letters, and more so than if they had come from generals. Now so it is when there is intentional adding to the scripture and intentional taking away. Now I have then used Darby, Aramaic in Plain English, and The King James Bible, and yet who speaks ancient Hebrew and knows what all of it is exactly? But there is Zion and Jerusalem, and Jerusalem is as towns without walls, as people without walls, and Zion was already there, and it shines brightly from the Earth, and the fourth day comes with the rising of the sun. Now then there is the nations which do not respect any establishment of religion and do not forbid them, either, and the nations which participate in religion. Now there is mention of Zion in other places in the Old Testament, other than the book of Zechariah. Now I have searched a little, and is he not called Michael, who I call Minus? Now he is called Joshua in the book of Zechariah, and I called him Joshua Heyudu. Now again, he is a different type of Joshua than that Joshua who is found with Moses, is he not? Now he is also what I call The Priest-King of the Zion Temple, and is he not the sun that rises? Now then, for something I do not know all of, and actually do not know of, The Book of Truth, or the lands of the re-occurring happenings that the Lord gives to different people, that these are re-occurring things that the Lord is giving to some, these things I do not know of, and yet I only consider them and do not know, for my understanding does not know these things, or if they are re-occurring in very different ways. Now yet, do they not know of seals? Now then, do they not consider a covenant, which is a thing they might try to discern, being a word of God? Now there is the land of Eretz Chadrack, and Damascus its resting place, and yet Damascus I do not know, in the spiritual sense, only that it is not Egypt, is not Babylon, and is not Israel, and in the spiritual sense, what is Damascus? But even the land of America, I know, in the spiritual sense, and the type of enlightenment of Damascus I do not know as a society. Now there is Canada, and if Eretz Chadrack is in other places, I do not know. Now then if Damascus is to be rest and a rest-fullness of peace, and indeed a place of rest, I have wondered if it is then also as a pillar of Eretz Chadrack, that the place of rest is with the enlightenment of Damascus, for Damascus is described in stories of Elisha, and the captain of the host was healed by dipping seven times in the Jordan river, for he had the sickness of leprosy, and relenting, he dipped into the Jordan and his flesh was restored to him, and he offered to Elisha, and Elisha refused, and yet the servant of Elisha, being deceptive, ran after the captain of the host of Damascus and took money from him, and upon returning to Elisha, he was given the leprosy that the General of Damascus had been healed of. Now then if Damascus is the resting place of Eretz Chadrack, what will happen to the resting place, and will the resting place be made different? For if it is a pillar of Zion, as it is with Damascus, and a pillar even for Salem, that it too is with Damascus, then will it remain the resting place of these? Now that is not to write that those of Damascus are the majority of the people of Eretz Chadrack, for the majority I do not know, only it is seeming that the Zion Jews are the majority upon the whole of the Earth, and even the Zion Levites. Now I have even come to considerations of things I am not able to give any preaching of wisdom on. Now has it not been written Damascus is taken away from a city? Now if Damascus is removed and the majority were Zion Jews and Zion Levites, and the lesser portion, Salem people, and there are also the great many who are the royal priest-hood, saved by the Christ, and all Zion is by the Christ, and the Christian Sufi then there is that portion which might be taken away? Now then Zion Jacob, he will then possess all? But Damascus is not considered Muslims when the prophecy was given. Now then is Damascus to be a resting place, that it is a pillar, and a good, or is Damascus then iniquitous that it should be removed? But what else is it, but Darmsuq, by another name. Now then will any ask of me, what of the war specific that occurs? Now I will then weigh it as bowls of sand and offer no opinion to you. Now will any say, should our nation be allied to them? I will offer Zion and the peace of it as a reward and give no opinion upon it. Now where this is straying from the norms of this, then there may be a time I will offer wisdom with consideration of something.




Now then will any look for the cloud by day and the smoke, and the fire by night that is a dwelling place of Mount Zion?




Now if foolish daughters have walked the land prior, yet there are the women of Zion, these daughters, who have escaped, and are there not many women who have not been foolish, to walk foolishly and cause their image to be ruined with foolishness and what is unseemly and not desirable? Now a prostitute of the enemy is not even worth consideration, for she has liked to assume she is as the women, to take priority in their place, even take attention that is for them, and she is not worthy considering until she is finding that which has caused her so much grief, that she depart from her harassment of others, for the Christ is more patient than I, is He not, and do I come to die for any, or offer the same as He has offered? But go not to me, when you must go to the one you must go to, and I am not a messiah, but have need of the aid of Heaven much, do I not? Now will I seek to Shepherd much an enemy to repentance, rather than seek to kill? But if children are climbing upon a soldier when he comes to visit a village when he is on an errand of some type, yet still the wiser among the adults, if they will listen carefully, are good to be keeping their climbing to a limit, for there is indeed a mission that must be given attention, and a soldier cannot indulge children forever and always while he is visiting a village. So will there not then be people among you who are considered the wise among your people? Now the angel being a young angel, and not a Chief angel, is he a young for the standard of a man?




Now there is a family of servants, soldiers, under the high-priest of the house of purity and false-good, who is with the spirit of the devil, and there is a family of servants, soldiers, under the devil of hell, of brimstone and shifting rock, and there was the family of the devil's Israel, Jacob, and there were part of the family under the high-priest of the house of purity and false-good, and they were Babylon, and not Palestine. Now large scissors these wicked had with them, and they were wicked and cruel, and they bit like dogs at the air before their face, and snipped their scissors before their faces, to threaten the Lord's people, and would they not also threaten an angel so? Now iniquity in death they bit with before their faces, and they displayed without showing that they were Unichs. Now they were going forth in the Earth, in our land, that is actually God's land, and being like soldiers of cities, meddling when there was no need or reason, and not for the sake of justice, and clipped is their mouth and throat, and rillet is in their tongue, and pride and false-purity, it went with false-good and a great measure of puritanical-ism. Now then there were many things from Babylon found in the Lord's land. Now then there were those who had made the way of Cain their religion, and they rise up over the innocent, and there were those becoming so wicked, they were doing combat against innocence and they were receiving the number of the beast upon their head and upon their hand. Now then I considered Benjamin, who might be for what I appreciate, the consideration of angels when others were given other tasks, and he pleased me, because I was as if left at an outpost when there was war, and yet I went there on my own, and too, Joseph pleased me, and the house of David pleased me, and Judah pleased me, and the darker horses that walked in the land of North, they pleased me and were like snow and silver sprinkling in the wind, and it was like good-tidings.




Now if the land is good, yet why were there many things of Babylon found in it? Now believe it to be normal to find many Babylonians in your land? But they are not the majority, and I considered, yet I am in a part of the nation where there are more Babylonians, and a type of children were not having firm homes, and were receiving from people who give to the Lord, lending to Him, and there were Babylonians and sycophants, the the sycophants were not Babylonian, but were of another family of the devil's. Now then there were women of Babylon, purified of iniquity by the lake of fire, and Zion need not flee, and there is nowhere on Earth for Zion to flee to, for there is not another planet, and was there not another mistranslation among them? Now Zion cannot flee, and yet there are Hebrew Jews, Jerusalem, being as a people without walls, and what is not danger for a nation is not the same as for those of Jerusalem who are sown among another people. Now do they not, some of them, do their best, and the Lord is their judge, for I know nothing of what they do, those who translate, and the Lord finds fault even with His angels. Now the spirit of a woman of Babylon appears at capacity and these things, that the spirit will be killed when these things are abolished.




Now rivers? But are your people to be as a prophet who speaks to an angel? Now the council I have given is for a wide-river that is predictable with considerations of those who must move their houses and shops. Now the Priest-King of the river of America, his name is Biden, at the time of this being written, and the river of America, at the time this is written, it is a river that has influence over the whole of the Earth. Now he and his council are controlling the river, and he is Priest-King over much more than the river, for he is a Priest-King to be leader of his people, and he controls much of the whirlwinds and the storms that can be sent out from that nation. Now he is Priest-King of also the Eagles that fly over the land, even those Eagles that find what is good.




Now as for the Daniels and the Danielle's, these too are in the land.







Now Isaiah ten and the letters of Paul are both blasphemous and lacking knowledge of wisdom, for even if Isaiah ten was offering the future of a single person to be the anti-angel, yet the things in it are not things of wisdom and knowledge and much given in the letters of Paul is blasphemy and having things not of wisdom and knowledge. Now void of understanding is the mocking of the High-Priest of the house of purity and false-goodness in Babylon? But the angel will dispense of what was placed among the Christ, who is the word, as he finds it. Now the blind are made to see, the lame to walk, and it is knowledge of the son of God, and so the angel does as they have already done many times, the deacons of churches, and removes false-books. Now if the angel had not fulfilled more than double the measure, he would offer more explanation. As for the devil, he has already known of Zion, and it was already there, and he may not block any from entering the kingdom, or Zion entering that was already there, for the angel has opened the seal of Zorrobabel, and the sun rises, the High-Priest, and Zion shines brightly upon the Earth.




Now to Zion and Jerusalem: the Lord is not likely concerned whether people know what he does, for it is the Lord's business when they do not know what the Lord is doing, for the Lord is an insane little girl, to pardon my rudeness, but I am having to declare it, for he may cause anyone to know if it pleased Him. Now the Lord is not wicked and a fickle-girl who is powerless over the men he has created, and He is the father and God, and it is the Lord's will whether they know. Now I write again of Isaiah ten and its mis-translations and possible additions.




Now the devil, I believe, wishes to ruin the celebration for Hebrew Jews and Zion Jews, and I do not believe the Hebrew Jews have any trouble with the idea that the Lord has had other children, other nations, and Abraham is the father of many religions, many nations, that as some have indulged in strong drink, their mouths are speaking embarrassing things, that they invent inconsistent concepts, and bring forth contradictions in their own speech, for whether strong drink or the devil, the celebration may continue, and Damascus, prior to Muslims, it may depart in peace, for let none of these rob any of you of the celebration that is the Lord's and yours.




Now the fool has said, the children of Israel do not add anymore to the scripture in Isaiah ten, and yet he was for blocking all of Zion, even people from entering into the kingdom, and he was for blocking what is not even added to the scripture and he begins with mentioning words of perversity and iniquity. Now where the Lord speaks, from there on as a person may read, there is the chapter, I believe before a thing was added. Now where it says, thus says the Lord, there the book of Isaiah ten begins, and a fool has been threatened, a panicked Shepard, not competent to Shepherd, and he has written general things that are not keeping with wisdom, and he calls books to be trees, as a foolish speaker void of wisdom might speak with his friends, and yet he writes it in the word of God, and his mouth is base and foolish, and he does not know what things are, the holy things, that he speaks without wisdom. Now then, who else would like to Shepherd where there is no threat? But in adding to the scripture, he desires that none should add to the scripture or speak freely, or that scribes may not write freely, and there is no threat that needs to be handled in this way, by adding to the scripture. Now has a prophet also said, without me? But he is not even a prophet, then, for what power has been given to him, the dust that would return to dust, but power is the Lord's, and it is given by the Lord. Now there is vile speaking, by the standard of scripture, and wicked boasting that is unjust in what is prior to the Lord in Isaiah ten, and the person not competent to Shepard was not required. Now I have found such in some of the letters of Paul, in the New Testament, as well, and yet the last book of Isaiah I do not touch, for some may know what it means, for the Lord has mercy upon the angels, even to an angel, and even for my sake, that I did not know the Lord would do such for an angel.




Now Esua, more man than man, allergic to beauty, a fickle-girl, a faggot, for he calls men homosexual who are not, and he is allergic to beauty. Now if there are any Sodomites, yet the righteous must also deal with Esua, the faggot?




Now Sodom, it is a kingdom of hell, and Goharra also, that is harrassing when there is nothing, that there is nothing that is any of its business, and there are those of Sodom who have received the number of the beast, and Rome is one of the devil's kingdom, and it is ill, unwell, a little insane, that Rome is not well, and Sodom and Egypt, it is as Sodom, and brutal, also. Now Sodom, is it not close to the lake of fire? Now then there is no punishment written for women to be with women, and it happens when there are men, more, who are being with men, sexually, and men being with men is called fornication. So more women have found it acceptable that they should be with women, for the society of what men have committed has effected them. Now when the soil for planting has lost the stones and the mountains, then it becomes mud and then slime, Sodom. Now let stones be just, not to be too harsh towards the good soil, for planting, and the soil, it does not have to believe that the rocks are against them contrary to what they have been told to believe about rocks and stones.




To the Priest-King of the Zion Temple,




Indeed in my meditations I did not perceive the size of your domain, and I also did not at first perceive about China, that over the course of the books, my opinion was different as I learned more, so that in this there has been a journey, as they mention in metephore. Now I believed it was the same domain as the Emporer, and I committed error, and indeed the Zion Temple is the domain of all the Zion Jews, and this would then be your domain, and it is a great portion of the Earth. Now are there not sixty-two books of Isaiah that have not been tampered with? Now yet I do not mention the last book of Isaiah and would you find it surprising, and yet have all said that is a prophecy of the end of Earth, as if the Lord's return? Now it is also good for Zion to know, if the place they are in becomes as Sodom, and what is described of women in Zion, the Zion daughters, at the beginning of Isaiah, is not any concern of their clothing or what they have put on, but what is described is behaviour not beautiful and spiritual sickness and un-wellness of Sodom that they have, even if it is not fully taken them. Now the clothing is nothing, and what concern is there for the clothing and what they have put on? Now then I have already mentioned, that do not people who are Jews take only that wisdom that is in the domain for Jews, people, that the wisdom I have given not make some of them sick, if they are not able, for to one it does nothing, and to another it makes them sick, spiritually? But it may very well be because of the books I have given that it has happened to them, and the Christian stays with Christianity, the Muslim with Islam, the Zion Jew, with things of Jews, and they are Jews believing in the Christ. Now I speak not judgement but advice, but they have turned to asherahs in their apparel, and wear the sun? Now especially the second is not respectful as jewellery, that decency is understood, and the symbol of the diary is neutral, as is everything, but the un-wellness is understood. Now Anathoth, in Isaiah ten, is one of the names of Titan, and if there is truly a faithful one who is Anathoth, this I would like to know, for by reading of Titan, you will be able to know who she is if you find her.




Now is not mount Zion every mountain that is covered in much mist during the day and is like a torch in the moonlight? But Zion is then large, and larger than Jerusalem, and is having more than one Mount Zion? Now then there is Misty Mountain, in Alberta, and is this not a Mount Zion? Now then are all of the Mount Zion's able to be found, and if this is the Mount Zion of Eretz Chadrack, then do not those of the North to America, call it Mount Zion, and if there is another Mount Zion found in America, do they not call it Mount Zion? Now if there is even a Mount Zion that is found in the land of Jerusalem, do they not call it Mount Zion? For since when are Jerusalem and Zion enemies?




Now Ariel, I will only say, does the Lord not correct the ones He loves, and is there any correction against you? Now I offer it as advice to you, and I do not desire to meddle. Now then from Ariel to Ariel, and your trees too, may not have been welcome, and neither things are trees, for the words are present, with intelligence you, Ariel, proceed, and lay the orchard, and plant the field, and trim the seeds you do not want, and indeed there was that which I believe to have been added to Isaiah ten, for he calls them trees, and there are other things in the English translations, and yet at thus says the Lord, there I believe the book ten to begin. Now you give messages in the common tongue, and the name given to you is Ariel, is it not? Now from Ariel to Ariel, I say, I wish for the Lord to be with you.




Now a slave is not king, for a king is not jelous, not envious, caring for many, that it is a void fantasy of slaves to punish those who are beautiful, and in their fantasy, they are cruel and brutal, for it is not a king, but has not a servant become a slave? Now what has the scripture said? But do you not humble yourself that the Lord may do what he desires? Now those who weep within themselves because they will never be beautiful, life being too unfair to them, indeed these are having to begin again, from the birth of them, the day they began to speak, for they are parellel to where they must be, and yet humility, is it not better? Now by vainity it is not fair, and their own glory they do not perceive, for they are not righteous, indeed not just, for they say, I have worked hard, learned, and yet they have been exceedingly lax, and they have not paid their dues, not to the Lord, for in all manner they have failed to perform those things of value, that they are parellel to the mountain, and they must go up by the mountain. Now they have paid to the partner, to the partner of business, but have they lent to the Lord, giving to the poor? But they have committed things of diligence in work, but indeed they have been lax exceedingly and not done the work of the Lord as well, and so they have built a tower next to the mountain, and the king's palace is on the mountain, that the Lord would give, and so then abandon the tower, go by the bridge to the mountain. Now then you may be beautiful, who were made to feel not beautiful, for because you were in the tower, there you perceived yourself with less esteem and could not be satisfied, for there is not good bread and drink in the tower, not good meat, and indeed the light is harsh and grotesque upon that place, and yet at the mountain you will there be beautiful. Now then when the evil comes to you like vainity and harsh metal, when it pulls you to bow to the beautiful who has not money, that you forsake your integrity and prostrate yourself to him, indeed, you may not bow, for it is forbidden, but hold yourself up, and indeed let not the metal and the vainity pull you to prostrate yourself, and humble yourself, let the vainity and metal depart, have satisfaction of righteous blessing in you, for the devil tricks you, he attempts to cast you down, he directs your eyes to the beautiful, to cast you down, to tempt you that you not be satisfied. Now then kick up, for if there is any above, yet they are not greater than you, for you may look to God, and be satisfied, with a wholesome satisfaction, without arragance, and let not the sight of the beautiful tempt you anymore, for the devil tempts you to cause you to prostrate yourself by evil, by being impious, that you ignore and have satisfaction, and more things there are, and then the tower you are in, it will become the mountain, and you need not go any longer way, if the Lord does this. Now then I looked to the beautiful man who the devil directed sight towards, and I, the angel, will look upon him, and others will look away, and indeed I will wonder if he is with the Lord or with the devil.




Now does any give honour to those in the kingdom of the devil? But I do not write about religion. Now they were separated regardless of what religion they claimed, and one side was with the devil and the other with the Lord, and one had the devil over them, and the other the Lord, and who from the Lord is able to honour an elder if they are the devil's, with the devil's kingdom? For if you will honour those of the devil's kingdom, yet there is war ongoing, and the devil's people do not want honour from you, younger who would honour your elders, for they are not your elders, but are the devil's people, and those of the Lord's kingdoms who are older, these are your elders? Now if you will honour the elders, not elders, who are the devil's, do they not view you as an offender, for do you not bully? Do they not hate you for this? Now will they not say, fear me and not God, that they beat you away, causing you to remember that you should not do this evil to them? Now do they not react to you with much cruelty and bully you soon? But it is folly that you do in trying to honour elders who are elders of the devil's people, and not your elders, for there is war and one is enemy of the other, that even if you are having peace, yet you do not trouble the devil's people and they do not trouble you, and yet there will be war and trouble, for the devil's people will indeed attack in time, and then time again, and you will indeed be trusting God, having integrity, keeping to morality, and they will hate you, and the war will continue, for the angel has received money from the devil's people, and he has given money to the devil's people, and the war has continued, and he has lent again, and they would have killed him if they could. Now the devil's people have given him food, and he has helped them up from falling upon the ground, and the war continued.




Now then there is the rich man falling, and yet lifted on to greatness by a beautiful who has less money, and the beautiful man who the Lord's, and yet another beautiful man, the devil tempted the rich to bow and fall and spill out their riches to a person who had less money. Now then, be with integrity, blind your eyes, all people, to the things of others, for it is very wise.




Now to be against reproach, to injustice, the angel is beautiful, guy-pretty, and pretty, that foolishness and injustice not occur when there are those able to reproach with what is not true. Now he is six feet and half an inch, and slendor built, scrawny and yet without any scrawny-ness. Now I will look upon the beautiful men, and judge which is the Lord's and which is the devil's, and yet can even I know it? Now if the devil tempts you to bow down to the beautiful man who is the Lord's, yet is it not only the devil who does this thing? Now you may not bow to him, you men.




Now to David I will speak, and let there not be reproach to him, for all things must be right, that none is said, by foolishness of Egypt, yet you are jealous in some way, for there is what is required by the Lord, and what is jealous to turn to evil. Now then the angel was always then with David, if any is wanting to ask of it.




Now ashkelon, ashdod, delightful land, place of peace, and love between a Jew and a daughter of Ashkelon, it will wear away riches and what is securely made, that the men who are Jews, whether Zion or Hebrew, may at least know, and yet do not those who stay firm, who keep themselves with the Lord, remain in what they were? Now think I advise not to marry? But by no means do I advise not to marry. Now yet I have never met a proud philistine, for every place I have gone there was not a proud philistine I found, and yet I imagine there are some who are proud. Now women too loyal to their husband, that they become wicked, not loyal to him with respect that the woman fears God, but overly loyal that they become wicked, yet what is this thing, that she is loyal to wickedness, for if the husband is wicked, at least let him not be demanding in some way that she be loyal to wickedness and evil, converting to wickedness, that she is considered an offence when she is loyal to him by fearing God, and respecting him? Now this is a thing where the husband is wicked, that she is respecting him and fearing God, and yet if a husband is going further to say, be you wicked, no longer a woman, but a man who is wicked, that you fear not God, that you do not right to me by doing what is right, this is a wickedness that should not be heard of, for by being overly-controlling of others it occurs, and it is as a dragon that swoops down to kill, to utterly kill, and now by all means, for the sake of humanity, for all respect of life, deliver yourself from him who the dragon severely mauls and kills, for he is a brutal and wicked thing, covered in metal, a soldier of the devil, a mighty soldier of the devil covered in metal, very wicked, so that they have not even mentioned him. Now she is Zion, and the devil knows it, one of our people, the woman, or the child attacked by him, and he has no business to be in the house of her who is Zion, for she belongs on Earth, and the child too, he belongs on Earth, but the soldier of the devil, he has no right to be on Earth, and the Universe is the Lord's. Now women, do not envy a woman when this is the case, but have pity, for your enemy the devil is on Earth, a soldier of his is on Earth, that here you will not envy, for this concerns the people, all of them.




Now the soldier mentioned, the soldier of the devil, he is as a planted thing among the people, a brutal and mighty slave, a soldier of the devil, and he smothers, he bullies without fists, without weapons of the hand, and he is mighty in this, intelligent in this, and yet void of wisdom, for he smothers and crushed and mauls, and he has the lack of dignity of a Sodomite warrior, a sychophantic man who desires men, that he is a very wicked thing, a monster hidden behind a concealment of peace, for he is called by me, Bulemrock, and he comes in stone, in metal of Babylon, in the brutality of Hebrew slaves, and other forms, and he comes in white stone, in grey stone, in many colours of stone, and he comes in metal, and he is extremely over-controlling, an animal that crushes, that kills, for better, far better for any woman to dwell with a man who hits her with his fists, for he is far better, if he is a man of compassion, of integrity, though he strikes her with his fists, for he is a relief, a well of peace in comparison to the Bulemrock, and I must not judge men who have struck women, and men are the Lord's.




Now there is another thing I must not judge, being the sensitive in a thing, who falls to guilt, and yet they are truly wicked, and if they fall to guilt because of a child, and yet they are not really wicked, or if they fall to guilt even because of a woman, for there are very sensitive men among our people, and yet they are not really having any right guilt in them, by which they are found with guilt in them, these things I may not judge, and there are wicked attempting that the righteous should fall to guilt to be like them, for they are hateful to be judged by the righteous who have not even judged them. Now you are right to be condemning the wicked and justifying the righteous, and yet wisdom is required, for at one place the devil judges and another place the Lord's person, and let none think they should fall if they are not really wicked, for it is a thing of Peter, that he fell through the waves, and it is a thing of the Jews of the Old Testament, also. Now as for an angel? Yet will he not pour out fire upon a city entire, all life in it, if the Lord commands and he is given the power to do so?







Now Tyre, rich man who is wise, I am not against you, and have received good from you, wisdom and good, and you have paid me with good, and I am hoping that it will be well for you. Now is there not peace between Israel and Philista? Now are not the daughters of the Philistines, many of them, like angels in a way? Now is there not peace with Israel and Philista? Now I believed you to be a genius when I encountered you. Now I will attempt to take away the shame that should not be implied by the scripture, for was there not a time when the Lord said, attack the Philistines, and yet when has He told any to do it these days, over five-thousand years since that occurred? Now Ashkelon, yet she was fair, the only woman I met of her, and Tyre, he was of the dark shade. Now are there not dark shade who are Ashkelon? Now Hammath, yet I will not deceive you, for though I have said, Tyre would be a great king, yet Hammath, too, would he not also be a great king? Now it is not my job to comforting, even if I am choosing it at times, in the giving of wisdom, and for the slaves of the dark shade, your slaves and Hammath's, and the slaves of those who are people, and not slaves, for these I care nothing, and they do not concern me, for they are brutal and iniquitous. Now then Edom, I hate Edom, and it is as Sodom, a place of illness, of sickness. Now then will you reason as a blind and deaf? But Damascus, yet do you know what it is when you go out into the mountains? For I do not say it. Now I was unsure of what it was, and wrote of things, and it remains, and indeed I know what it is now, and when you have gone into the mountains, indeed even when you go into the forest, and indeed by fire, and indeed by the plants of the forest, and these things. Now there is yet Damascus found in my nation, and yet it is as good, that I believe it to be good, and I have wondered, is it the resting place that it is a good thing, or will it be removed by God? Now I believe it to be good, for it must be good, and David, is he not king by it, that without Damascus, he would not be king? Now is there not then covenant between David and Damascus? Now then, I said, yet it is good, Damascus, and I searched, and understood, and David, still, is having Zion's Damascus. Now genius, wise man, there is also Ekron, and I considered him in meditation, a people who have understanding in integrity, strict to obey the Lord, to be with understanding and righteousness, and Jacob among him, indeed a man I considered righteous, and he was strong, righteous, and he was dwelling among them, and indeed their leader liked Jacob, and all were fearing God, and yet Jacob was dealing much with an enemy, and he was as if alone, except for an older and mightier than him, and yet I said, he is blessed, because of his righteousness, and Ekron was fearing God and with integrity, and this I considered in my meditation. Now what wickedness was found with Ekron, and neither was Jacob iniquitous in the consideration of them, upon pondering this thing, and yet it was only looking out my window, and the Lord knows when some commit error, and yet wickedness was an abomination to Ekron, and he was honourable, and Hammath, he was considerate, and Ham, could I even reproach him? Now the arrogant, the brutal, those with the spirit of Beelzebub among the dark shade, these are as worthless rocks under the ground to me, and if you tread them, is there wrong for you to tread rocks under the ground? But I do not write about holy stones, and many people are holy stones and holy mountains, and yet there are the bitter rocks, and yet who knows what it will be? Now the good cities of Philistia, for me, these I am liking, and because you are the good cities of Philistia, yet you may decide for yourself, with your own judgment, when you know, if the priest-hood of Japeth is benifiting you in the things they do, for do not many have as if a sign above their door, because of their goodness, that no harm comes to them? Now I do not speak for the priest-hood, and I do not know what they will do, and indeed they have the one-edged sword, and are they not vowed to only be for the fair shade?




Now then what is Eretz Chadrack, but it is Damascus, also, and it is taken by David, by kings who are soldiers, and it is among the citizens, some of them, and indeed it is the resting place of Eretz Chadrack, for it is Zion's Damascus that is in Eretz Chadrack, and because of Damascus, I considered, I will not liberate the physicians, the dragons, so long as Damascus is the resting place of Eretz Chadrack, and yet Beelzebub is still leading them to be fools, and he is sown among them, guiding some of them, and yet I considered, yet I praise the sliver, the wicked candle, for because of it they are not as much stolen by Beelzebub, and so I considered, yet the higher king, higher than Solomon has been the cause of it, that the wicked candle is with them, and I desired to liberate them, because their souls had a hidden bitterness, hidden from them, and because their souls had an anger, because they had worked diligently for a very long time, and they were given long hours of work, and not the great blessing that might be with such long work, and they were angry at me, and I was their champion, and they did not perceive it, and I said in my heart to them, you should have known I was your champion, if only after a little time, for my heart had compassion for this thing, that you were not given a greater blessing because of the wicked candle, and the long hours of work, and they did not perceive I was their champion, and were angry at me because of beauty of the angel, and there is no shame to the resentment if it is them, for such is not perversity, and yet I considered Zion, and David, and the Lord, that it was not good that I should liberate them, and so then I will say to the physicians, do not hate me any longer, as if an offendor, for their souls perceived me as a foreign thing that was a bastard, that their souls said, I know not what this is, and it is an evil thing, and so there was vexation and they rebelled against God, not knowing they rebelled, for in loyalty to God, some were disrespectful of the angel, for they defended the Lord and the people, their souls, and so then consider me as David, as with king David, spiritually, for I am not a traitor, or an offendor, for their souls were loyal, and their hearts were stirred up against me, and Beelzebub was disgusting towards them, for he would be as a perverse thing among them, giving them sickness and disgust, as a disgusting and friendly thing, that is offensive, and I said, they are clean, the physicians, and they are blameless, for it was hidden from their souls, and yet in the future they would not be blameless, for once it is told to them and they read, then they will be able to know, and also I am not Absolom, and this would be a thing of folly to consider, for they were loyal to God.




Now they will not longer be in the darker times of enlightenment anymore, the people of Zion, and they will no longer accuse each other with foolishness, as if not an people having understanding that is greater.




Now then I call the exodus from much lesser enlightenment inrelit so that where people are rebuking with ignorance of Egypt, a lesser enlightenment, and it is not a thing of shades, they may say inrelit that they do not participate and take part in what is below cognitive ability and a human standard of comprehension, for having strayed into Egypt, we have attained Israel in the level of enlightenment. Now no longer will a woman say to a man things of Egypt as rebuke, and no longer will a man Shepard into Egypt if inrelit the exodus, has been achieved. Now then the soul perceives much truth, and you are able to reason with the soul and heart, both, that some things are hidden from the souls of some, and some things are revealed to the soul of others, and what is jealousy? But does it exist? Now there is indeed jealousy, and yet be loyal to Zion and do not be jealous to want the things of the kingdom of the devil. Now there is indeed war between the devil's people and the Lord's people, and what does jealousy mean in this, when there is no jealousy. Now they say jealousy when they have not completed what a thing is, so that the people might say jealous, and others might say the thing of wisdom and truth. Now who is wise enough to never use the word jealous? Now jealous is true and the thing of knowledge and wisdom is true. Now then be blind to the things of others, what they have, and Zion is not puritanical, as they have said wrongly prior. Now if there are even devil worshippers among Zion, who learn ways of wickedness as their studying and religion, yet they are still terrorists, regardless of their religion of the devil, for they do not learn in vain, even if they claim to be peaceful, for they are indeed able to deceive. Now if any judge is appealing to the ignorance of Egypt, when he knows better, and all perceive the truth, yet he should cease doing this, for it is unjust that he does it. Now Greece, it is part of Zion, for the angel is also with Greece, and yet to have a cognitive impairment, this is foolishness, and yet Babel and Buddhism and Greek things, they are all able to be Zion. Now rebel not Babel, at it being said, for Babel is a golden calf that still staggers, for it is early, and though you say, we stand much often, yet you have not gone even a little far. Now then peace with Babel, if it can be, and no discord being sown, for it does not aid Zion, and the atheist of Babel, when attacked can say, I too am Zion, and those who believe, they are human, too, are they not, as atheists? But indeed they are.




Now the sliver, that is wicked, but I consider it wicked, and Damascus I do not write is wicked, is this sliver, this candle, given by David, a sliver of Damascus? Now the Lord hates titles, for the sliver, yet it may do what it does, and so I have written what is right, that they are warned. Now Beelzebub, let him silent on this matter, whether he is found with a woman or man, for he may be upset to want very much a return to ignorance.




























A Garden and River




by

Lucifer










Now to give to those interested especially in the Christian Church I have created a small section that may be considered a type of separate chapter in The Diary of Lucifer which contains many books not given that title, but which are still part of the diary. Now these are strategies of combat and ability, as it pertains to the Lord's kingdoms, or so an angel might believe such to be. Now here is mentioned some other things about the kings who must be mentioned, who do not speak to the people, who are not seen, who are not known, and what I write I must write, for they have done it, and I must so include them, for they have taken a thing and so it is, and I do not know what it will do. Now if any of them should ever do something so absurd as to bow, or give honour towards me, they will not have the right impression, for they are separate and different from the other people, and if they do not appreciate what I have written, why would I apologize? Now it is not an option what I do, and so it is.




Now the righteous having integrity and obeying and not exceeding, will not the Lord take action? Now keep your lips, even shut them and is not the Lord able to do what is right? Now even repent, become clean, keep your lips, for a single person might see a town levelled by the Lord. Now the Lord is victorious and He is creator and indeed light excels darkness and He has power. Now some go away and are then punished later and they stand on ground that is water, indeed they do not walk on it. Now pay attention apostles and hear what the Christ says, for He is the corner stone of these books. Now royal-priest hood, faith has it and it touches your arm and they are rising from broken legs and broken feet. Now then it is your role to be passage-ways, a priest-hood, to the Lords power.




Now the projection from the wicked wrath of the guilty in what they say should be done to the righteous it is what should be done to them, for the heart betrays the keeper of it, and the punishment they say should be for another who has done nothing to them and yet they hate them and have wrath, being guilty, what they say should be done to the righteous so it is required to convert from the devil as lord, that by the guilt of them there is hope.




Now the most elite of America of David, of soldiers, and Eretz Chadrack, these need not pay attention and yet I cannot lie in this thing, but the soldiers not most elite must still pay attention concerning the angel, for if they are fearing God, can I pardon you if I will not pardon? Now then there is the Lord and you are His and can He not give good to you? But He is the Lord that it might be considered by you that you fear Him. Now those most elite of the soldiers, if they are not so elite as these I mentioned then yet because they are elite and the best of their nation these too need not pay attention. Now yet still if the angel gives any protection by Mala there is consideration by others from another nation that is elite that they have not gotten what is with others for they are not given any special thing that it was as it already was for them concerning the angel and there is no special thing for them. Now then Muslims, there are soldiers who have bought something, that the Lord is knowing, and I cannot do anything about it concerning them and I also cannot refuse to write that they have bought something with what is not money. Now they are not Americans and do they regard their leader? Would they even consider him or her? But it is only for them and the angel neither chose it and he cannot take the thing of Mala they have bought, and so it is, and it is not known by me what it does. Now these are as if friends of mine and yet no other has this, no king, no leader, no nation, for in this thing I separate them and they have done so, not me, that no nation has their right, and I write so to the Muslims, that if they are speaking and it is the words of others, then it is sin of those they speak for, and yet would these ever speak to you? Now what they have is only theirs and not that of any nation that they may say friend of the angel and for as for their nation, it is another thing to us. Now then kings and the angel, and so it is and their nation, it is another place with consideration to this.




Let God make wicked the wicked if you not exceed the realms of righteousness in your judgments, for it is the Lords and not yours to make wicked the wicked beyond righteousness, for you will turn around and doing good you go towards evil, for does wickedness attack wickedness? But it is against righteousness. Now I write of a thing as if combat, that when you have spoken righteousness and receive insolence then you may cease in your lips, for it is the Lords and He makes as He wishes, for He is God. Now then you cease and the Lord is God, and what is the Lords is the Lords in all things that are the Lords that they are not yours, and by integrity and shut lips the Lord is able, and by obedience is He not able and there is also prayer, and the royal priest-hood, are they not visiting Earth? Now continue with righteousness and be trusting God that you not become a nihilist and is God not all powerful? Now then a nihilist calls down fire and the sticks are remaining and yet people are made as if killed and the Lord has power and so let His power be on Earth, that His power take what places it takes and obedience, and is there not prayer. Now will you boast if not righteous? But all those in the Lords kingdom, when they boast they boast in truth, for the Lords kingdoms are with truth and are truth and so be saying, let the people obey, let the priest-hood that is royal be found visiting Earth, for there are those who wield the Lords power and He makes them like angels, does He not? Now are you not feeding the poor? But obedience is not at church but it is outside the church and they gather, those who are for obedience that they have their common belief in God. Now forget not the atheist who is hot or cold, and they are not the enemy and they refuse to pray, and they are not dishonest in this as Babylonians would pray and believe and not believe, who commune with the devil.




Now the rudest Jew, Zion or Hebrew, righteous, intelligent, having much understanding, having wisdom, being acceptable and knowing what is acceptable, strong, kind, he I have called being of the Terum. Now the sorcerer, for they do not magic, but learn the ways of wickedness, to slay the righteous upon their beds, studying much, being worshippers of the devil, part of the groups of devil worshippers, and they are also terrorists, what will he or she saw to the rude Jews? But take a saw, an axe, devices from the carpenters, and be you indulging in the cleansing fire of violence, for let the word of it fill the ears, like sin, that the violence of it makes right the Earth, and makes it wholesome, and so I will want it for Eretz Chadrack, that you be a violent nation concerning sorcerers, for the cat is wise, she is cunning, she is deadly, and the male cat likewise, and they kill the sorcerers, and do they not call a rough hand, the rudest of men, who have joy in justice? Now pursue the sorcerer to where they flee, indeed it is sport for those liking this thing, that though they flee to another nation, yet you bring them to your prisons of brutality and violence that are for the sorcerers, for terror of this violence, it is as wholesome Earth, cleansed of sin, and green fields, for put your foot upon their neck, put them under the saw, for a meek has given you advice. Now yet there are not sorcerers among the Philistines anymore? But only if they have become part of the devil worshipers.




Now do not the devil worshippers, some, want to attain the number of the beast? Now do they not say, the devil can win, and he wish to attain citizenship of Babylon, for it is part of their religion of devil worship. Now the house-cat, she or he, they are having a greater sense of decency than most, and they are wise, and deadly, having the knife, for the house-cat does not like for the man to give her much attention if he is having a wife, and have not people noticed this thing? For the house-cat is the sign of him or her, and they kill the sorcerers, and they must be with the soldiers, for she or he must be able to kill, and they are studied much. Now she may not kill the wife unless the man is saying, I have married an enemy and I did not know, and so then is the cat, that if a man is married then the cat chosen is a woman, that you not aid sorcerers, and the cat is wise, that the wife loves her, for she is the cat of houses, and so you know of the sign of the house-cat. Now then the cat studies, and does she not study in the camps of David, in his schools, and all the ways of wickedness she knows of, and she is able to know wickedness she has not studied and learned of, for she is wise, and he is wise, the man who is a cat, and he is not a man if he kills a woman? But he is a soldier, that the rebellion of Egypt not be against the man who is a cat. Now then make known and public some of the brutality that is committed against a sorcerer, that the land be made clean, and it is also known without it having to written that nothing that is published, no book, can be a sorcerer, for there is no power of a sorcerer in the publishing of books.




Now then if there are those who bond with demons among the devil worshippers, that they are receiving instruction of them, now then, sad foolishness to the righteous, but the demon-possessed will not guide you right, and they will not tell you the truth, not even to those who have bonded with them, for the devil is not divided against himself, and his kingdoms not divided against themselves, that those who have bonded with a demon, even if they are saying, it tells truth in some places and it has been witnessed, but the devil is not a fool, and of course he gains trust that he might deceive later. Now sadness for it, that you being righteous have believed in some neutral thing, and the Lord is all-powerful, and His power is greater, and so go with him, and learn his ways, and He is the father who truly cares for you, for He has created you. Now if a nation committs folly, be not envious of them, that you say, we will too seek the demon possessed and those who bond with demons intentionally, for they gain advantage, and we too will have it. But they gain a broken leg, and it will break in its time, and the other leg broken, and they will fall, and their flesh will decay, for one foot, then the other will sink into the Earth, the foundations of the building will begin to sink, and cities will begin to melt in Mala, and the flesh in mala will become rotten of many of the people, and a leprosy of Mala will spread amongst the people, and their bones will decay, and they will have gained an advantage, surely, you who thought for a moment to envy them, who are concerned for your nation, that you are loyal to your people to do good for them, for here your envy was wrong, and they gained an advantage in suicide, for the ground turns to soft and sinking mud under their whole nation, or under a whole city, that if they are turning to devil-worship, will it not be so? Now trust in the Lord, for how will He bless you if you are adulterous to be polytheists or if you are going to the devil for help? But in so much as they go further in the ways of the devil, you are going further in the ways of God, to learn His ways. Now as for those who learn of the wicked ways of the devil worshippers and sorcerers that you might be against these things, this is only the gaining of wisdom for you. Now then I write to David concerning these things also, that I offer council of peace, that you give a portion to the house-cats that they may advance and study.




Now Cessus, you may not marry Abishag, and the meeting place in truth, would only belong to David, and yet it belongs to none, and Adonijeh, does he not hate her? Now Solomon permits her, and David has desired that Solomon should be king. Now my heart liked Abishag, because I said, he who sits there now, he is considerate and will he not respect religion? But did I know if it was true or not, that he was what I believed him to be? Now I considered, the devil worshippers already know of me, for I have even visited a church of theirs without knowing beforehand what they were, and they surely already hate me, and indeed they do know of me, and have known of me for a long time, and they are indeed wicked, and they believe in God and they believe in Angels, and they believe in prophets, and the Bible they believe, and yet they believe the devil can win, and they are terrorists as well, torturers, murderers of the good for no reason, to please the devil, studying in craftiness and strategy how they might kill without it being known, how they might torture, how they might do all wickedness of the devil. Now those who have failed for much time at ever being good, are they not converting them, saying, you are meant to be with the devil and his people? Now do they not say to the child molester, yet they persecute you and be joining us, for we control a city here, and we have some towns in other places that we control secretly, and we are even above all corruption and the Midianites, and this part of another city, and some places further on we have people there, and you are safe with us, indeed accepted, and all who have failed again and again at ever being a good person, they will find relief with us, indeed they may finally be able to be what they are, for the yoke of Jacob was upon Esua, and upon all the devil's people, and the Lord has the Earth, that morality has been a yoke upon us, and we being the devil's are not right to follow their ways. Now it is a lie what they say, for they do not control much of anything, and they boast much of greater control and safety, for it is their belief that for the cause of the devil their people should always feel safe or else they will not gain more ground if they fear God, because of the justice on Earth. So they lie, and much, speaking always of safety, not liking that any of theirs should cease doing wickedness, for their people hate being threatened by the knowledge of morality and justice. So they boast of greater safety, greater control, and they have little, and society would crumble to ruin, and hell on Earth, for they bring hell on Earth, for they exploit that others are doing what is good that they may do evil. Now they ask that they may abuse a person, for they are the devil's people, and the devil they worship, and yet them who they ask cannot grant permission, for they too are the devil's, unless they have mistakenly thought some of the Lord's were with them. Now by this asking for permission to abuse, asking another of the devil's people for permission, that they may abuse some of the Lord's people, it understood that the devil is their lord. Now they abuse, and they consider what abuse they can escape justice in, and they defraud with meaningless arguments, and they slander, and they learn the ways of wickedness, and yet they are not many, and they lie that their people not be afraid, for if they fear God because of justice they will cease and the devil will not gain more ground on Earth. Now what do they say? But regard no threat from the Lord's people? Indeed the Lord's people, they have no right to judge them, for they belong to the devil's. Now it is war, and they are not entirely wrong, because the Lord's people, why would they judge the enemy soldier? Yet the Universe belongs to God, and the Lord has even made hell, and indeed they are rebellious with the devil, for the devil is rebellious, and so the Lord's people do indeed have the right to judge them. Now if they claim to have the city, they may have a neighbourhood, and not all of that neighbourhood, and the righteous may go into their neighbourhoods, that they claim, and if they claim to have much control of a thing, yet it is for a moment before justice. Now indeed they are wicked and dangerous, that you not be foolish. Now then for these torturers, will you not purchase the prison for torture, for it is for them, and there is hell for them for eternity.




Now wicca is a celtic religion, and it is not devil worshippers. Now do not many of the churches of devil worship, they are claiming to be Christian churches and other things.




Now the devil worshippers, they have been under the yoke of Jacob, under the yoke of morality, and yet it is the truth they have been under, for the Lord has created people and the devil is in rebellion. Now the Lord's rebels, will people not say, they are with the angels? But the devil's rebels, an odious people, obnoxious and loud as clumsy trumpets.




Now the over-controlling, the wicked bully covered in metal of a soldier, indeed a soldier of the devil, not liking to permit others that they should be able to perceive with standard cognitive ability, for they may not even say, they are jealous, brutal is he and going beyond the limit of what is a person's domain, for people are having the right to perceive as is human, for it is nature, and he bullies at what is nature, that is only the right of people, that they may live, and it is the Lord's things that he attacks. Now Zion women are permitted to fear God, for He is their father and creator, and they are permitted to be in obedience to God, for He is the Lord and God. Now the over-controlling, he is a soldier of the devil, brutal, for he attempts to force them to cease obeying God, and it is too much for spiritual war-fare, for with what he perceives, the existence of them as the Lord's people, he is hating them, and their existence, that they should be worshipping the devil and not the Lord. Now what does his heart say? But do not aid your brother who is the Lord's when he is righteous. Now have not some of Esua said, you will offend the righteous if you defend them? Now he lies in this thing, for he does not like that women should defend the righteous. Now be wise in this thing, for there are false-activists sowing discord, to fight against wisdom and greater enlightenment, that you should return to Egypt as a people, for you have strayed into Egypt much, that you be wise and considerate in this, not accusing a good man who is dealing with foolishness and even insolence, that he is seeming as if over-controlling when he is keeping with integrity, to defend himself and what is his right, for he deals with iniquity, that you not exceed the limit in one direction or the other, but you use cognitive ability and common sense, that you know right and wrong, for this over-controlling soldier, he is rare, and he is not common among the people, and brutal is he and he is found in many places, even among physicians, among people where he is able to bully to some degree. Now if he then puts on the mask of meekness, yet he is cruel, and he is covered in metal, for they cover themselves in metal, the wicked, who go outside the box of the human domain, unless it is to go outside the box in a good way, for the Lord, and yet who would ever say it is outside the box? But I write of being overly wicked in a fashion, that they rebel against God, not being wicked anymore, but wicked to be against the Lord. Now when it is a matter of survival, then who has even exceeded, but a matter of wickedness, it is rebellion against God.




Now he who grows angry at council to cease evil, that he will do more evil of the same, he was already much restraining himself, for he was furious.




Now some of the devil's people, they are claiming the Lord's religions as being what they are, and this is at least common sense among the people.




Now Babel is encouraging of religion, and yet where it is not so, they contradict themselves who are not encouraging of it.




Now arrogant is Beelzebub, even found among some of the women who are Chinese, for some of her, too, he is with, if you believe it impossible, and he is among the people, encouraging and mocking, that people not hear and repent, for repentance is frequent, and encouraging and mocking that people not receive their blessing. Now the man who is declaring and judging against knowledge and truth of the world, he stands at the side of the devil in hell and does not even bow to the devil, for he is great among the devil's people, and he judges and declares towards Egypt, that they not receive truth, those who are with truth and people liking truth and knowledge. For he judges as if with righteousness, saying, it is not so that this occurs here or there, and yet it occurs. Now a spear is in his hand, and a shield in the other hand, and he directs them towards Egypt, with his shield he directs them. Now do not be upset with them who are not strong enough to grapple with him, for he is strong and his shield is strong, for if they do not throw him away and go back towards Egypt, or if they do not much resist him, yet these are citizens of Zion, and they are not as you, man or woman of Zion, who will attack him. Now though they do not say, yet you are given to fight, and so has the angel been given to fight, for rebels of the Lord, yet he has allies and friends, and yet do you even care if he should bring his allies against you, if you should pay your dues for Zion yet again, as so many times you have paid your dues for the Lord and for righteousness. Now again in prison? Again being harassed for your bullying, as they no doubt call it? Again a hypocrite, as they will no doubt call you? Again not able to work for a little while for standing against wickedness and evil? Now what type of cowards are they this time? But if you say they should die, the angel says concerning you, they should die slowly and die, and you will not ever exceed the insanity of the angel, for the angel will exceed your wrath, you who fight for Zion.




Now Beelzebub, he is among the scientists even, with his arragance and mocking, and yet a new generation, does it not feel un-threatened, that it may seek what it seeks, that it does not have to follow their cults that are not religions? Now by fear there is one converting, that over time the truthful might conform, for if he or she is against the Lord yet by intimidation they conform eventually, and it arrives for them suddenly that they conform. Now less intelligent and they are great and evil figures?




Now rationing and dispersing wealth, what they call communism, and yet with freedom of religion and free speech, it is a thing of Salem is it not? Now if they are then saying, but we must forbid religion, for it brings capitalism, yet it is not true. Now capitalism, a thing of Jews, people, and dispersing wealth, a thing of Salem.




Now Damascus is the resting place, and there are mostly Zion Jews in any nation, it seems, for they are the over-whelming majority, and some are Salem people. Now Damascus is not wickedness, and King David has taken Damascus, and the people, Solomon, they have taken Damascus, for I write of Zion Damascus.




Now what will they say of Zion? But the people, the vast majority, won, and the time of the small portion is over, and yet the fight is always continuing. Now then there is time to fight, to fight the battles of peace, that are not with violence, for the people are king.




Now be not ignorant of great love, for though it is rare, yet it is exceedingly zealous for all your enemies to be disappearing and cast away, even the small enemies. For a man will say, it matters not, and great love will say, it is an abomination. Now she is wise, a thing not seen, for where is the sign of her on land, for she is not a lion on land, and she is another lion, and power and might is with her, indeed all respectful power of the man, having great respect for his wishes, for the angel cannot look into it, and it is stronger than a lion, indeed, the lion cowers. Now wise woman she is, and in her love, stronger than a lion, for I do not write in vain in this, and she is a rare thing, found one or two in every nation.




Now if you are not wanting to be fought do not encroach, for if you are indeed void of understanding, yet a beast, though not knowing better, must be pushed back and even attacked, and continuing without going away even slain. Now what manner of beast is this that smothers and would kill and does not know better, that hears rebuke and does not listen, for it is deaf, for the beast is deaf, and not blind? For the beast does not heed the attack? For a stupid and brutal beast, a giant cow with a thick plating, a dragon of some type that eats plants and kills and is dangerous, for do not say, be a Christian, for may not a Christian kill an animal if it attacks? Now what is murder? But it is the slaying of people when there is no just reason and it is the slaying of animals when there is no reason, for who kills an animal of nature when it is not harming any? Now be then wise, and remember the territory of people and of animals, that you remember this in your reasoning, for people are more tolerant, more patient, and yet the patience does not endure. Now a fair shade encroaches in places where it is implied he is not welcome, and I am of the fair shade, and yet books and words of writing, these are upon their own planet, for they do not encroach upon any. Now I write so for the priests who are writers, who are a type of priest, for they come upon their own planet, an isolation is around them concerning their writing, and it is good that it is regarded. Now they are then priest-kings of other planets that are not able to be seen, in another world, for it is a different land of planets, and I do not write about Zion, but of priest-kings, for they are the planets upon the surface of planets. Now then what are they? But they are the kings and queens of cities upon a planet.




Now be adopted by a lioness when you are an angel is not offensive, and it occurs more frequently than some might believe.




Now what is a zealot who attacks some? But is he not an itenerant animal, who wandering has seen, and his impulse is triggered, and he knows not for what reason he would attack, but later makes a reason that has no weight, and changes nothing. Now then a fish has been pulled from water, and he was down deep in the Ocean, for the Ocean was not having all of the reality of land that he was in, and being pulled from water, he sprouts legs that he should not have, and he attacks the fisherman, and chases at him, and snaps at him, and indeed he is even deadly. Now then what thing is this? But it is the deep Ocean crocodile, that you have not seen or heard of, and the scholars and writers and even religious figures have brought him up without meaning to when they cast their nets, and the thing from the deep is alarmed and dangerous. Now then, you deep sea crocodiles, I am a religious figure, by what men and women call it, and be not afraid, for I do not mock, and an angel is on Earth, if you will accept it, for the light of the ship deck is bright, and the water is gone, and the spear is in my right hand, and soldiers at the ready, and so be not alarmed, good people of the deep Ocean, for you are not wicked, and they have believed, some of them, that you are evil because you are on the ship deck, and yet return to the Ocean you must by another way if it pleases you, and there are many ways, for the Lord is your father and creator, and I am His, and you are not evil.




Now to write it better:

The deep Ocean crocodile is pulled up by the net of the fisherman and it is alarmed and sprouts legs, and it has been in the deep water, the depths of the deep Nile of Egypt, for there is deep parts of the Nile, and the Shepherd pulls him out by the net without meaning to, and he may return to the Nile, for I am a religious figure, and if you will accept it, an angel, and the light of day is alarming, no doubt, and the depths of the Nile are removed from you, and so be not attacking the fisherman who did not mean to pull you up. Now the rod is in my hand, and indeed it is not a spear, and the soldiers, they are able to be called and they see with Eagles, and you are the Lord's and yet you have been in the depths of the Nile that I called the Ocean, for my net goes out, it is cast, and you have been in the depths of the Nile, that are comforting, no doubt, for you dwell in the Nile. Now if you wish to return to the Nile, you may do so, and I do not keep you, but rather, leave Egypt, for the rivers of Jordan are better for you, and indeed the rivers of other places are better, for if you had been in those I would not have been able to pull you out without meaning to. Now the soldiers, they are intolerant and ruthless are they to what attacks the religious figure, for I am a religious figure in many nations, in all the realms of Zion, and a crocodile, it has no fear of man at times, for you are a dragon, and so I know you are not a zealot but have been pulled up from the Nile, not really a terrorist, and yet the soldiers are given charge and all must be at peace. Now who are the terrorists? But the devil is my enemy, and with whose hearts he is found, there are the terrorists who are my enemies. Now what dwells in the river is not the same as dwelling below ur, for the river's bottom is above ur, and men and women swim to the depths of good waters and recline in the waters. Now then be having peace with me, and leave the Nile for a little while, indeed take passage to the Jordan, for the Lord is able to aid you, that you may be in the Jordan, or some river of Salem, but if it is not good, and you will not make the journey, then you may return to the Nile and I apologize for disturbing you.




Now then has not a bright light erupted and moved as a wave that trembled the buildings? Now has not the Earth shaken a little? Now be not alarmed, you who are in the cities, for light erupts, the Earth shakes, and yet you in the palaces dwell in a high place, and so stay the soldiers and there is no need to attack, for if you will protect, then I am welcoming your hospitality. Now my name is Saruman, and Gandalf, despite what you may believe, is not my friend, and he has been going throughout the land before I was even on Earth, and he has been lying about me and telling truth both and truth about me he has not spoken. Now who can blame any if prior you listened to a wizard, an angel of a type, who lead you back into Egypt much, and some listened to him, Gandalf, and some did not heed him and they dwell in Israel of Zion, for there is Zion Israel. Now then what is this thing about Mordor and its evil? But what is this thing about hobbits who are good who are wishing to cast the rings into the fire? But if you are in Egypt now it is because of a wizard and he has lead you there because of what occured to the Hebrew Jews during a great war that he lead you into Egypt. Now deliver yourselves from Egypt and be going to Zion Israel or Salem, for Gandalf has told lies about me and many things he said to you in his guiding were true, and you cannot be blamed for listening to a wizard for he came to you in spirit, over a great amount of time. Now I am not agreeing with those who carried out the war and did what they did to the Hebrew Jews and Gandalf has lead you as he did, and I would council you not to evil, but to Zion. Now if you have been told lies about me, indeed you may have wisdom that you might know that I council you to Zion, and it is already there and among you and the sun rises for the fourth day. Now decide for yourselves whether you go with Gandalf or hear my council, for he has been a liar to you and guided you after the great war. Now then I offer you to abandon the lesser enlightenment, for Gandalf is grey, and he has not been given another cloak, for grey he still is, neither hot or cold, and he leads into Egypt those who would listen to him, and he brings about the bullying of those who have better understanding. Now because he is grey in his ways and he councils foolishness, yet he has not guided in all foolishness, for after the war he guided you and there was no other to give you council, and he came as a spirit, and I come to you more directly that I concern many in the land by sending out a wave of light that causes the Earth to shake a little, that there is an understandable thing concerning me, and yet there is no cause for alarm and what is done cannot be otherwise, for it causes the Earth to shake. Now I ask, read what I have to give to you, and consider my council. Now as Gandalf has lead you astray, so it may have been necessary and then he may still be my friend, although I am not trusting him, and yet it is now the fourth day, and the sun rises. Now by Tolkein you have received a strange prophecy, and yet I am pleased by how it occurred, for he has been good to me in what he has done and how he has given it to you. Now then I do not restore the ancient days, but it is the fourth day, and I offer wisdom. Now then they are not guilty for anything in that they have been lead astray, or as I consider it, they are not guilty, for Gandalf may have lead them astray for a reason after the war, and even lied about me a little for that purpose in his Shepherding. Now who knew what I have to give you? But did even the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants know, and did those of compassion know, for have you as a people not then done your best in your being lead by Gandalf the Grey in what you have sought, with what wisdom you were given? But now you are given more, and Gandalf has come prior to me, and does his spirit prepare the way for me in some ways? Now has not Tolkein prophesied, communing with wisdom, being a Christian, that he was a wise prophet who was guided in what he did and even not knowing that he was a prophet? But will there not be a time when some of you will ask if this has occurred with any other of your writers? Now you have had what wisdom you have, and you were given the corner-stone, the Christ, that brings Zion, and all of it on the third day that the third day has come to the fourth day, and the High Priest, the sun, rises upon the fourth day. Now the heart of Tolkein has communed with wisdom, him being wise, and he has given you a tale, and it is the tale of Gandalf, and yet he has told the opposite and it is good that he did so, for whether the Lord guided him, or he understood, he is blameless to me of any wrong. Now my staff is not a spear, as I told the crocodile, and I have given a small book to John, for his vision, I know now, was foggy and not very good in what he saw based on what he described, and yet he has described correctly at a time when he must have seen me, and where he saw me I do not know. Now I have come from town to city to city to town and to city again and have your mighty men, elite soldiers, not already encountered me, not knowing what I was? But though you say, we are very advanced, yet your communication, is it not still as birds that carry parchment from place to place, and soldiers of cities might say, we have never heard of him, and some of your soldiers, we have read about him, and others, we have seen him and even know his name, for will we not see him often when we fight, for he must be there for some strange reason. Now Gandalf comes as a long guiding spirit and Saruman with books. Now those of you who have followed the ways of Gandalf, are you not blameless, that what may have been right is now becoming the much lesser thing, that you are now offered more wisdom from Lucifer, the angel, or Saruman, as your wise prophet might have called me in his searching and his considerations, whether he knew himself to be a prophet or not.




Now what was forbidden in the Old Testament? But sorcerers were forbidden, and if any calls angels to be wizards or kami, both of these are acceptable to me.




Now Isaiah says:

And Jehovah will utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian sea; and with his mighty wind will he shake his hand over the river, and will smite it into seven streams, and make [men] go over dryshod.




Now in Egypt, do they not say, he or she did not know when they did wickedness? Now there are indeed children of ignorance, who are having this thing, ignorance, as a thing of righteousness to them that makes people innocent, and it is foolishness.




Now then insolence is not according to truth, and relies upon ignorance, and injustice, too, relies upon it, for ignorance is with those who are deceived to do injustice and wickedness. Now then if they are not really ignorant, they do not fear God, and test Him.




Now Kir, does he not stand at the right or left hand of the devil? For he does not even bow to him, and he is magnificent in evil, and though the devil might speak to the angel, does the angel recognize Kir, that Kir is not insolent to approach? Now Kir, he Shepherds into ignorance, and he is mighty, and he is impious, having understanding to be impious, to be disrespectful, for it is a wisdom for him that you not say, is it coincidence, that he is foolish? But he is not in any way foolish, and he stands at the right hand of the devil or the left for a reason. Now then why will you permit Kir to be a soldier of the city, for in this he is having his same place as in Babylon, in many ways. Now then did you not know that Kir would be impious to King David, even if he was King of Israel, upon land? Now will he not be impious to an angel? But the angel would not be surprised at it. Now the devil Kir loves, and the house of David he hates, and the house of Judah, indeed, all the sons of Jacob he hates, and I write of Zion Jews.




Now in what city was the diary written? But was it not written in Edom and Moab? Now it is not Sodom or Gomorrah, and the atmosphere of the devil, it comes from his people who dwell there, and yet there are then other people. Now Edom and Moab, land with many sorcerers and even habitation of devil worshippers, it is a city that wants for good, is it not?




Now will you not pray with words of Mala? Now will you not read the prophecies with words of Mala?




Now then Cush I leave to another and Pathros I leave to another, that they may give their wisdom.




Now then a planter planted seed and half came up good and half bad, and the good were the remnant, and that they remained, for the bad were going away, departing. Now then some saying, I am Christian, they are the devil's people, and some saying, I am another thing, yet some of them are the devil's people, and the devil's people were not to be honoured by the Lord's people, if they were an elder, for the devil's people hated them in this. Now does not the Lord plant seeds, and a remnant is good and yet it must be gathered together, and the angel seeks to direct towards Zion, for it is already among you, for none need travel. Now then the lesser enlightenment, is it not cast away? Now then you have the prophecies of Isaiah and the book of Zechariah.




9 Sheol from beneath is moved for thee to meet [thee] at thy coming, stirring up the dead for thee, all the he-goats of the earth; making to rise from their thrones all the kings of the nations.

10 All of them shall answer and say unto thee, Art thou also become powerless as we; art thou become like unto us!

11 Thy pomp is brought down to Sheol, the noise of thy lyres: the maggot is spread under thee, and worms cover thee.

12 How art thou fallen from heaven, Lucifer, son of the morning! Thou art cut down to the ground, that didst prostrate the nations!

13 And thou that didst say in thy heart, I will ascend into the heavens, I will exalt my throne above the stars of God, and I will sit upon the mount of assembly, in the recesses of the north;

14 I will ascend above the heights of the clouds, I will be like the Most High:

15 none the less art thou brought down to Sheol, to the recesses of the pit.

16 They that see thee shall narrowly look upon thee; they shall consider thee, [saying,] Is this the man that made the earth to tremble, that shook kingdoms;

17 [that] made the world as a wilderness, and overthrew the cities thereof; [that] dismissed not his prisoners homewards?

18 All the kings of the nations, all of them, lie in glory, every one in his own house;

19 but thou art cast out of thy grave like an abominable branch, covered with the slainthose thrust through with the sword, that go down to the stones of the pit: like a carcase trodden under foot.

20 Thou shalt not be joined with them in burial; for thou hast destroyed thy land, hast slain thy people. Of the seed of evildoers no mention shall be made for ever.




Now by order you cast the devil down, for he has placed servants in high places, an abomination, and he has placed even slaves in high places, and base things in high places, and he has attempted to prostrate, and he has been impious, and this is the beginning of Babylon, and the he-goats are placed where they should not be, for they are better to be councillors to kings, and the devil has gathered up many things and placed them high, that he would be impious in this way towards what is high of the Lord's people, and he is not having the same name, for he is the devil, the old satan, for I have given you order of things and the Bible has given you order of things, for the devil gathers what he can for his kingdoms.




Now the righteous man of Wartak, yet when he is excessive in these things is he not only a rebellious person, to be against Islam first, and then later all religion? Now he is a hippie, and yet a soldier of some type, and indeed a rebel, and he loves Egypt, also, for he says, yet the issue of a man is bigger in Egypt by the ignorance of the lesser enlightenment, that it gives freedom, and yet in truth, because of foolishness, Israel is in the later, soon afterwards understood to be far larger, for a twig boasts against a tree.




Now I said of my own nation, if I remain here I dwell alone, because there are no men left in this nation and they have killed all of the men, those who were really men, who were truly righteous, or they have departed from the nation, and I could walk to any place, and there is nothing left here, for the nation is already lost, for a curse has come, a plague like a thing of an apocalypse, and the nation is empty, held together by nothing. Now then was it true? But I was for Eretz Chadrack and yet where had they gone, all my people, for I dwelt in a land where there were very few men, and later, where had they too gone? And so I said, will Zion be elsewhere and only not here, for has the Lord been angry at this land that he has devoured it with animals and wicked people who have no fear against committing injustice, who hate justice and righteousness?




Now those who normalize what does not make sense, and is wicked, they are of a lesser enlightenment than Egypt.




Now the angel dwelt in the land of the philistines, and if they say otherwise, yet it is true, and the devil attacked him much, and other places the angel dwelt. Now then I considered, what is the wisdom I have, and how much do I know? But the truth is big, and it is seeming infinite, and God knows all, and I loved him in this, that how much wisdom must He have? And He is all wise, and I did not know why the devil attacked me so much in the land of the philistines, or why I received good in other places, and he placed the power of it in my mouth, to change where I was, as if instantly appearing in a different land by the power he placed of it in my mouth, and I was not competent yet to wield the power and it caused me affliction and yet I was too reckless, too busy with the work of writing the books and giving wisdom, and so I said, let me be beaten and let fire scorch me even, and I will be reckless, for I write the books and continue with what I do, for I am not able to learn yet to harness the power He has placed in my mouth. Now then Ashkelon, the women of it, were good to me, as women who were of angels, and yet still I did not trust them, for they were in Mala, and I did not remain with them, and the daughters of Israel, Zion or Hebrew, they were good to me, and they were in Mala, and I said, I would remain with them, the women who are Jews, whether Zion or Hebrew, at least in Mala.




Now the women who were infected with a semi-Sodom, who were as a type of foolish children in a way, and with iniquity that was concealed, these were going closer to be children of the devil, I thought, and they were ill, for it was a sickly thing of foolishness, and they worshipped a non-existent religion of lacking knowledge, anti-intellectuals, and they did so like wicked children, to drag down Zion, that we must be ignorant and foolish because they lacked knowledge, for they were igno-slacks, and they said of those with intelligence and morality, they are Jews, and they were not Hebrew Jews, but they were the fair shaded igno-slacks, foolish and ignorant women with much iniquity concealed. Now make yourself well, for it is illness, and it even comes from the climate in which you have dwelt, that you have been infected by Edom and Moab, a land, and it is Edom that has infected you, and it is sickly and ill. Now then has not the Lord killed the angels, all of them, and rolled up Heaven, and killed all the people of the Earth for your sake? Now you are not alone.




Now Edom is illness, it is sickly, and what will men call it? Now it conceals iniquity sometimes, and those without iniquity still it infects them, and the clean have said, I have breathed in the poisonous air of this place and become sick. Now then, does not the Lord know, and who judges you? But they are not judging with understanding, for they should be defending you if they have impulse to judge, rather than judge, or is it not so? Now they breath of the air, but the air does not go into them? Now they are able to judge because the Lord has given them a protection from the air, that the poison does not enter? Now should they rather not be grateful, and being with compassion? Now will they say, yet I obey better that I do not breath the poison? But what obedience seals their lungs up from the air that is poison, if the Lord has not given them a special protection from it? Now the angel has dwelt in the land of Edom and Moab, and yet if the Lord rolls up the Heaven, even still the air is having the poison, and it is a cloud, a vapour, and it is sickly, as a sickly and ill thing, and I said, it is because of the devil's people who are here, that the air is not clean, that it is polluted. Now the clean were ill, and they were more obedient than all, and the sorcerers were many, and there were even men desiring men who had become sorcerers with their things of Sodom, and there were Babylonian sorcerers and all the devil's people were practising sorcery, it seemed, and this was down the mountain, at a lower place from the mountain, and a place of closed shops and much crime, and ruined buildings, and much theft, and there were many of the innocent people among them, and Judah was among them at times, and injustice was everywhere with regards to thefts, and there was much fraud and extortion and rackets and I considered, the nation is taken by Midianites, but was it not mostly Edom and Moab?




Now the teacher of animal, the religion called animal-slavery, he is zeolous for the devil, for has not the devil said, yet the people should be animals, and they should all be slaves, and so his zeolous servants have gone out and taught zeolously the ways of animals, teaching with accusations, even, and craftily teaching, poisoning good teachings with their doctrines, a little here and a little there, slowly teaching the people that they might abandon their inheritence and fall away from God, and some being more open, and direct saying, do not be a low-thing, and it is not a low-thing they be, but the teacher of animal-slavery changes all words of Jews, people, whether Zion Jews or Hebrew Jews, for he speaks true ignorance, and the ignorance is parellel to all truth, for every word that is true he speaks a parellel that is pure ignorance, for those who give honour, this is not being low, but being high, and it is understood by the cognitive ability of people, and yet with a lie, he declares, slave, and he smites the land with ignorance, with lies, and to the one learning, slave, and again he smites the land with lies, and it is not cognitive ability, for he speaks below human understanding, and they do not have the time to practise the philosophy of Greeks to explain how foolish he is, and they do not readily and easily have an answer for him, to speak back to him for his foolishness, for how can they easily answer this stumbling block and speaker of ignorance? For none ever suspected that any would not understand at the level of humans. Now what do you say then? But I am not an animal and I understand things as a human. Now to him, what his name? Animal teacher is his name, for he teaches to be like animals. Now his name, it is even animal. Now he is smiting the land like a much less powerful angel, and he is a worker of the devil, and he declares ignorance for truth, and ability is with him. Now others who are zealous for this thing, they are normalizing what does not make sense, and what is wicked, to change the language of truth and human understanding to what does not make sense, a reasoning of the devil's kingdoms, that is ignorant. For the devil's kingdoms, they are built of ignorance, and the normalizing of what does not make sense, and what is wicked, it is the giving of false-understanding, and giving it to people, like poison, that they may understand wrong and reason not by the truth, and it is a little here and a little there, and soon much understanding is gone from them, and they become jealous at what does not cause jealousy, and their understanding is poisoned with ignorance and wickedness is normalized, even great wickedness that brings a person to hell, that is wickedness of Sodom, and wickedness more than any people who have ever been, and sycophatry is normalized, and it is as beasts of hell, those who believe things of hell are acceptable for Earth, wickedness beyond the wicked, more wicked than any people who have ever been on Earth, for would even Sodom understand these things? Would not Sodom say, it is beyond us? Now such are slaves below slaves, for even slaves are not able to tolerate them, that they are slaves to slaves, and at the lowest places of hell, more foolish than animals, sycophantic and wishing to defile and mutilate all that is sacred, never ceasing in their escalations of defiling more and mutilating more holy things that are sacred, and going so far, gaining the number of the beast, and taking others down to hell, that some others who do not resist them, they too receive the number of the beast, that what time is left for them? But if they then say, I will now be insolent, having the number of the beast, to be pure and good, blasphemous and wicked, having the number of the beast, and quickly I will be good and as if honourable, and I will live immediately as a good person who is honourable, that people see my goodness. Now these take the metal of Babylon, and flies go up from them, in Mala, and in them is the light of the lake of fire, that burns brighter than the sun, a pure light, and the small flies go up from them constantly, and they are below the Earth, and you may not even be able to step on their heads, for far below the Earth are they. Now what do I say about the shades in this thing? But smite not Ham as the animal teacher smites, when he is not being low, but high, and smite not any as the animal teacher smites, when they are not being low, but high. Now as for Ham, do you think I am judgmental of anything? But the Lord cares for things to an infinite degree, does he not? Or it seems so. Now I judge what can be judged, and not what cannot be judged. But what do I know? Now are you not also King, as Hammath is king, of your people? Now what sin the former Ham committed, yet you know it is not your sin after the time of Noah, for the Lord is your father and God. Now a remnant of Ham that survives, that remains with God, is it not to be gathered with the other good people, the other remnants that survive, that remain to the Lord? Now if the angel attempts to destroy the language of the Egyptian sea, do you believe it really has anything to do with shades of people? Now Ham is not Egyptian, and neither is Hammath, or Ekron, or Tyre. Now the Egyptian Sea teachers, they are the servants of the devil.




Now then will they not say, the dark shade has been going to war against Egypt, and the wise of them are against Egypt, for they come from the cities of Hammath, from Nephtali, from the good cities of Nephtali, and they attack Egypt and carry out war? Now I will for the first time be bold, for by my standard, I have not been bold yet, and so are not the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants aiding them in their fight against Egypt by also attacking their enemies, who are Egyptian, and yet they only attack the Egyptians who are dark shade, which is only right by them, for they are for Japeth's descendants always, having the one-edged sword, that they will not ever attack any of the fair shade. Now it is the only thing where I have been bold in my writing by my standard. Now then bless you, Nephtali, for keeping with integrity, and I hope for you to gain total victory in your fight against Egypt. Now as for Israel, has it not been given, do not despise the Egyptian among you? But the fair shade who are Egyptian, they are dwelling in Israel, and these need not be attacked, for the Lord is able lead them into Israel if He so desires. Now I am not a man, not a human, and the knowledge of it is these books, that it is double sufficient for you. Now if there is any paranoid to say, the angel leads astray, and it is conspiracy, yet this person who speaks of conspiracy Shepherds you away from your inheritance concerning this thing, for you do not have need of his words in this thing if you have need of his words at other times, him who councils you and saves you, you who are Nephtali. But one councillor says one thing, another, who is fair shade, another thing, and yet the fair shaded brings the sign of the books, and the councillor of your people is ignored in this thing? Now wield not the whip that appears in your hand, concerning this thing, against your own people, to Shepherd them away from the angel, for they have double long enough been established, they who are Nephtali, and so snobs of snobs you are, and superior to Egypt in every way, for what is their strength, them who are Egypt? But it is not fair, for you excel them in everything, for I believe that Nephtali excels Egypt in everything.




Now Nephtali I like, Egypt I do not, and Ekron is not Egyptian, and Egyptians I have said, they are close to slaves, many of them, and of Nephtali, they are worthy to be blessed because of their integrity. Now what might they perceive as Nephtali? But will they not call it all Ham, or Hammath? Now as if all descendants of Ham? Now there are other cities in Nephtali, and yet Edom, is it even from Earth? Now Nephtali, snobs, people of integrity, would they not so speak of you?




Now Ma-Nel, your councillor, the closest to his name I know, beloved, and blessed, to him I speak, wise man, what have we to do, and where do we go and what is occurring? But much is left unsaid, and there is no end, and yet order brings peace, all justice of truth, and Nephtali is not the culprit in the foolishness that occurs. Now what can my books give to your people? But indeed not much, and yet it gives a corner-stone from a corner-stone? Now it gives a discovery, that much might be known. Now let the wise be in their higher, right places, and not less wise in the places of them, and so I will have more hope because of it.




Now as for the angel, a polytheist I may not have as wife, and the angel is not a man, but the sign is given by the moons of Saturn. Now have they not rightly spoken, by the Lord, in the names of the asteroids, the asteroid-moons that are acceptable cults around Mars? Now Mars was discovered first in meditation, and I said, who is this person, for I offer him fruit from a tree, and what is he become then if he purchases, and he is a god of Zion, and then he was found in Zechariah, the book, and he was Mars. Now the Lord has known when he or she would be born, has He not? But He must have known, and did the Lord consider them?




Now Mars comes prior to me of Earth, and Jupiter is then come, and who then is Neptune, and Uranus? But mercury came, and is it Moses? Now then the Christ, and is it Venus? Now these prior to Earth, that the Earth is then established, people, for is the name of the Earth, the people? Now Heaven and Earth is established, and the people reside upon Earth, and on the fourth day, the stars in the sky, and the Heavens, and for the Earth, the people. Now what is a star? But Saturn is considered a star, by the religion, as well as the stars that appear in the sky. Now Mars is considered to be a star, and the sun, a star, and the moon, a star.




Now Eprion, Ephrion, those of the land that has the wall, and other places as well, Now then what do you consider of the Sarmatians? Now are they as the Japanese, who have joined the ranks of the angels, a fair shaded people, who had an empire? Now the Sarmatians are no more, and they were at one of the corners of the Earth, as it call these places, for they hold the Earth in balance, at the present time, and who can say which will be the corners in the future? Now then are there any holy beasts of the Lord, that go with Him, that are Ephriam, or Eprion? Now a winged woman is placed in a special vessel and it is sin that was committed, and yet necessary to do at the time. Now Epron, Eprion, is it even a beast that is having many eyes that is holy, and it is the Lord's? Now the beast is the Lord's and it is holy? Now flies come up from Babylon. Now the holy beast, it is the Lord's and has ten-thousand eyes, and so when what they call psychology is all true and advanced far beyond now, and ten-thousand eyes are found by it, will it not then be this holy beast of the Lord's? But is it so? Now psychology cannot be so, because at that time there will be no thing called psychology anymore for it will have slain itself by its advancement and then it will be having the enlightenment and understanding of a genius and it need not be greater than a genius to do so, to slay itself. But because it has not yet slain itself, yet the calf has staggered and stands much, and it is grown proud of its standing, and it will not yet offer itself as a sacrifice to the Lord, for when it is wise enough, it will have offered itself as a sacrifice, and for Zion, likely, and yet I do not know who it will offer itself as a sacrifice for. Now the calf is prior to Moses, for it is the calf, Babel, a golden calf. Now peace I have offered to the calf, for the wise of the calf, those that are truly wise, are they not those encouraging of religion? Now they might sacrifice the calf and have the luxuries and better things of Zion. But then who is the beast? Now is not the beast Ephriam and Epron, and the beast goes about with God? Now the beast is not Buddhism, but it is the Lord's and it is part of the Lord, for the beast is a portion of that which created the whole Universe, for this thing is not hidden to them by choice, for it belongs to the Lord, and by it, ten-thousand eyes, that His name I will not speak who has the beast as a portion for Him, for then it is known that He at least has ten-thousand eyes who created you. Now then what goes with the Lord, it belongs to Him who created.




Now has migdal eder (tower of the flock), hill of Bat Tziyon, been then called? But who then has time to study The Diary of Lucifer? Now I have had a head-ache this night, and I do not sleep. Now because of its length and it is ten times as long when read, twenty times when studied, and more when studied further, are not gurus required for those who might ask questions?




In Isaiah ten, I would consider the mountain of daughter Zion and the hill of Jerusalem, being and.




Now there is the booth in the vineyard and there is the city under siege, and these are not things I am for judging. Now even other things, I am not concerned with, for this is not what I have come to judge, for none of these things, including the other, was I interested in judging. Now what is judged is wickedness, and the war between Heaven and hell.




Now the fortresses of Asshur that are anywhere, hidden or known about, will they not be torn down? Now the sorcerers? Will they not be killed? Now those who travel to other lands to torture, will they not be found and killed? Now seven Shepherds you bring against it and the eighth, not a Shepherd, an atheist, brought by men. Now then a sorcerer is stalking, and so it is discovered, for they wait to commit their acts. Now those who organize and stalk, indeed these too are sorcerers. Now cannot many buildings be a fortress of Asshur? Now in places of the wounded, even is it found, and by a foreign nation. Now a thing occurs, and the observer of clouds says, yet it is mine enemies, who I have wanted to attack, and yet the wise are not these observers of clouds. Now they have attacked when it was others, nations where there was no attack, and by the observing of clouds it was committed, and there are those attacking with no evidence, that they find that to attack with little for which to kill. Now will any be thrown into prison with little for which to kill? But the observer of clouds is a slanderer when it is so.




Now there is the philistine who is a parasite, for these philistines have not conscience in their acts, and the woman says, I am the wife of another, though I am married, and she cares not for it, for she is a parasite to the other man, that she will not let go of him though she is married. Now such a philistine is a parasite, and the other man, he has a wife, and yet it is not her, and she seeks to keep man and wife from each other. Now there is little guilt and remorse with her. Now for the woman happy, it may be so. Now then if she is not this, of this type, she is not the type that has no conscience.




Now the eighth who is not a Shepherd, an atheist, if he was luke-warm about his disbelief would he be the right person? But I believe if he is luke-warm, agreeing to pray, of this type, he is not the right person.




Now then if the Lord plucks up, and to safety, the Elson-pretty from out of the midst of your cities and towns, them being beautiful, men and women, both, will not the cities crumble and be destroyed? Now by the removal of them the city will collapse, and it becomes as the water-fall falling down each level, collapsing down, and there at the new place is the open chasm, a great pit at the bottom of the water-fall, and the walls of rock of the pit, Esua, the walls of the rock, and clear, blue water, and the bare walls of rock exposed, and at last, very low, a clear pool of cold water, and they will be able to see, who understand, there was a city here prior, but the pretty and pretty-beautiful were plucked away by the Lord, to safety likely, and the water-fall fell in layers and at last there was the soil and it fell away completely, and not long from the time the Lord took the pretty from the city, and the same happened to the town, for it became walls of pale rocks, and a mist rises, and a bare coldness, and where there was a town there was frigid water, and the sun no longer fell upon that place, and the sun no longer fell upon the place where the city was, for now there is only a pit, and if there is sunlight it is the sunlight of Edom, and Edom coming, it took the water from the bottom of the pit, and a poisonous vapour was there. Now I looked upon it, and it the city was Moab and Edom, and the town, I could not descern its name, but I called it Nazerah and Esua and the later had water in the pit, and a thing like a mist seemed to be seen, and yet the mist was evil. Now then from where did the poison come from of Edom? But did the water-fall break the soil to a gash in the Earth that brought up poison? Now let the people who study nature aid this, if they like. Now by the removal of the beautiful, so it occured, and by the bringing of the beautiful, will it not be aided to be made right?




Now then say not the name of the Caananites, that they gave that is wrong, if it will bring Edom, and wear not the sun-bracelet, if it brings Edom, for why should beautiful women and men be infected with Edom? Now then Edom is sickly and men not knowing what to call it, they say, homosexual, and yet it is not what they call it, and yet if any is infected by it, has it not come from the air, that you do not judge them? Now be not an aggressive and wicked people to harass quickly, for you are able to mind your own business. Now by the taking of the land, the plucking up, the river flows and it falls layer by layer, and it takes another layer, and the soil gives way and there is a great chasm. Now then if it is Edom, there is no water, and the sunlight is sickly, with a poisonous vapour, and if it is water, is it not frigid and there is no sunlight anymore? Now David, keep your elite soldiers, who are of great ability, and I council you, send the pretty to walk about the Earth, and crumbled place, will you not learn from me, or I should write, learn from God, for he has made me what I am. Now then profanity, is it beautiful?




Now then against the devil, a bon-fire before the dwelling.




Sarmatia:




Now the concern of Sarmatia is the concern about Edom, and a fire to be against the devil, a bon-fire, and smoke rising to the Lord, who is God, and keeping clean and purity, clean of Edom, and Esua, and Cain, and Ahab, and indeed clean from every wrong thing, being clean of all villains of the Bible, welcoming Damascus, fearing God, avoiding what is profane speech about the sacred, not blaspheming, the women being able to choose to fight and the men being able to choose to fight, indeed honouring love and humility, refraining from Sodom and Gomorrah. Now these are good things and the Lord is God. Now the bon-fire is mentioned, the river, for the land, to smite the land with order and good, and the forest, to be a hedge that keeps away Edom, and the rocks upon the ground, for cleanliness and purity of the Earth. Now not anything but the Lord is worshipped, and He is the Lord, and the Christ is His son. Now does not one say, I am of the Lord and protect the Christ, and another say, I am the Christ's servant and do His will? Now more gold than silver and not dross, not rust, not eating of what is not edible. Now for another more silver than gold, and not rust, and not eating what is inedible. Now the one-edged sword, and the horses, and the spear and the bow and very much the knife. Now then let it be flooded with gold and luxury, and all the beautiful things worthy of Sarmatia, and all the beautiful art and the sculptures that are beautiful.




Now then if any are outcasts for Sarmatia, far removed from the people, as is written, and any lame of foot, or in some way lame that they are desiring to study the giving of wisdom, then I would say, let it also be with the study of this thing given, the Sarmatians.







Now a shaking, and pain, and the fourth day comes, and is it not the time that the King of Assyria is our enemy in Zion? Now it is a time of stars in the sky, of the Heavens being established, and also the time of the King of Assyria, that from the time of the Christ's rising, it has been the third day, and in the Earth three days of man, he rose upon the third day, and fulfilling all the thousands of years in his time of ministry, and childhood, and now the fourth day comes, and when the king of Assyria enters our land, we fight him, and if he comes with thousands of sorcerers, we indeed fight them, for they will use technology, and all their wickedness they have studied to do war with the people of Zion. Now the stone in the wall speaks and the board in the house answers and a Uriah would not stay at home, and be at peace with people, for he has attacked the land, the whole of the nation, hating the man who did not do any wrong to him, to attack him. Now Esua is come as a zealot over the land, and he rebels against his own problem, else he would do nothing. Now there are the devil worshippers who study sorcery and is not David able to train the cats of houses?




Now the blood of them in combat, for you warriors of the Lord, it is green and orange and all strange colours of insects, that you not believe you have sinned in combat, for it is not yourself, but you have drawn the blood of many soldiers. Now with my breath I have slain philistines and why philistines should have been attacking I do not know, but it seemed to have been the devil's choice. Now what people is this, that bleed strange and sickly hues? But they were sent of the devil, of demons, and no pity I did feel. Now why were there some of Damascus with them?




Michoh 4:9-11
Be in pain, and labor to bring forth, O Bat Tziyon, like a woman in labor; for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and thou shalt dwell in the sadeh, and thou shalt go even to Babylon; there shalt thou be rescued; there Hashem shall redeem thee from the hand of thine oyvim (enemies).

Bat Tziyon: daughter Zion, daughter of Zion

Sadeh: part of field left unharvested for charity to the poor. Land.







To the Priest-King of Zion, from the angel of the covenant.

Now to the Priest-King of Zion, I do not believe that the place where there is a water-fall is in any way a poor location still, even if Mist Mountain, or Mount Zion in Eretz Chadrack is located in the west of Eretz Chadrack. Now there are many signs in nature, and the signs are as if infinite and all around, and I do not imagine that the Zion Temple will be at the site of the water-fall. Now I have wondered if it would bring more balance if the angel was in Russia, if they wanted him there, for he is liking the Sarmatians and so likes the land of Russia, and also they are bringing balance to the Earth, as one of the four corners, as I call these places. Now America I have said it is a corner, and Russia, another corner, and the other corners others can decide. Now then Latin America, Africa, and Australia are all very different places.




Now Uriah is not gentle, but filled up with hatred and anger, whether he conceals it or it is open, and he is not the gentle who gives honour, the gentle who follows around the great, for this who is gentle, he is the gentle prophet, as I call him, the wise and gentle prophet, gentle and in the fashion of Daniel, and he is the anti-Uriah, the utter opposite of Uriah, following around the great, and his presence, it even is a wall against Uriah, the mean animal, who is even assembling the nations against people who have integrity with his slandering mouth, for he conceals his anger, his rage, or he does not conceal it. Now then the angel hates all true Uriahs, and says, they should be killed, even die slowly, some of them, for they fight as wicked cowards, attacking their neighbour, and what cause is there, and for what reason do they attack? Now the rage of Uriah, what will any call it? But the rage is fire, intense burning with iniquity, and it causes the land to be attacked, for what kindles this rage? But there is nothing. What brings about his great anger? For he even at times assembles the nations against a person, slandering as he goes, gathering up an army that does not belong to him.




Now Uriah, not a thorn in someone's side, but more like a knife in someone's side. Is he not a person of the devil's, that the devil has his people among the people?




Now then the Sarmatians, will these be outcasts far removed from the people, and the lame, those able to be wise men and women, who have the time to study the books the angel has given? Now then we do not do anything so foolish as to stretch the head, or remove some part of the body, even if by lacking of knowledge, some believed that it was a common practise, almost, as if it was not very rare. Now what is the removed part? But are there wise among you? Now the women are warriors, and they do not remove any part, for all decency. But they are often more beautiful because of being a warrior. Now the stretching of the head? But these are people companions to angels, and the angels are high, and no sign, for all decency, is required. Now then all spirits of the villians in the Bible, these are not wanted by the Sarmatian, for these spirits are sin to them, and Edom is an enemy. Now then do we not keep the bon-fire lit before the house of the angel, and it is lit before the dwellings of every Sarmatian, when it is so wanted by them? Now these are a people of combat, of the knife, the horse, the spear, a people of great ability in combat, and they have the one-edged sword. Now if they do not any longer have these things in combat with battle-bows, such as the elite soldiers use in other nations, yet do they not still learn the arts of fighting with these? Now will David then not train them, if it is desired, that he will teach them in the combat of the battle-bow and knife? Now the clothing of the Sarmatians may not be worn in combat with the battle-bow, and yet it is known by them when and how often they wear such clothing. Now when the smallest battle-bow is kept, do they not still wear the clothing of Sarmatians?




Now the Greek philosopher, the visitor, did he believe himself wise, that you told him some things, and he did not understand? Now the mocking of the Greeks sounds more like praise considering the truth. But if you go to a place as a visitor, Sarmatians, and one of the people of Beelzebub, who his spirit is with, is being king of the people you visit, and they did not know he or she was their king, that the people are for you, and for peace and wisdom, and Beelzebub, who they did not know was their king, is revolting against you, for he would be over them as well as you, then you will know, he is trying to kill the angel, for a threat against you in this way, is a direct attack against the angel, and this Beelzebub is not really of their people, for he was hidden among them. Now Beelzebub has done this with many people, and especially he has said, I claim Ham's people, all of them, even if I cannot claim their kings, and he is always as if the people are already his and have been his, even by his right, as if he has justly taken them. Now the angel does not recognize his lordship over them, and it is nothing, that he is not really lord of them. Now if he attempts to drive you off, yet he has no right to be on Earth, and Ham is king of the dark shade, and he is Nephtali, and the kings of other people are known. Now if Harrods are likewise among the fair shade or the slightly darker shade, not spirits of Beelzebub, but rather Harrods, although some are Beelzebub spirits, these are not their people, to you, Sarmatians, but they are imposters among their people, and the Harrod is filled up with ignorance in his head, and his eyes are down, at below your feet, and his eyes are dim, and he is seized with stiffness of mind, of iniquity, and he does not know one way or the other way what he is, whether he is with the devil, or whether with you, and whether you are companions to the angel, being holy, or whether you are the Lord's people, also, and yet he is still imposter among his people, and he is in need, by consideration only of you Sarmatians, of being liberated, for he is seized by ignorance, and his eyes are dark, his pupils have become black with blindness, with iniquity, that slivers of dirt have been packed into his pupils, for he has made himself blind, all the Harrods of the Earth, not liking to look upon the truth, and he has shoved black metal in his pupils to replace the pupils. Now then by the lifting of the ignorance, Harrod's armour will be slain, evaporating away and upwards, and what is left, is it not a good person that is left, for the angels are high, and what is then to be assumed of the companions of angels? Now then take power, for it is of the Lord, and His power, for you are warriors with more abilities, will you not be, than what they call possible, in some ways. Now will not Beelzebub recognize you? Will he not be arrogant, and yet if he is afraid, he departs his host, and he or she is left in a good thing for them. Now the animals and animal teachers of the Egyptian sea, they are not even human, and having complaints for the devil, that they are the devil's servants. Now defend the people against God, against what is good? But indeed, will some of the animals of the Egyptian sea not do so? Now an animal of the Egyptian sea has even said, there should be no words of writing, no giving of religion and wisdom, and it is not even human, not even for those who dwelt in caves before the cities, if it was ever so. Now if they have also the spirit of the children of men, yet these are not the children of men. Now if a person is dropped off by a winged dragon, a grotesque dragon of some type, and it is dropped among another people and immediatly it begins to act as if the people do not see that it is a person of another people group, for it seems to reason the people do not know, and it begins to rail against people, as if to start a riot and sow discord, starting base and foolish contention as if the complains of the people who are sick and unwell in mind, and the people, who have been in peace, are about, do they not notice the foolishness of this thing, the futility? For will they say, is it only meant to disturb people, with how perverse and wicked it is? Is it only a sicophant, dessecrating the beauty of religion and of this place? For they seem to mock, and yet they are only trying to be disturbing, and mocking what? Can anyone tell? But are they not sick, and unwell? Now do they have a demon, and are they also with the spirit of the children of men, and yet they are unwell, making themselves into a disturbing spectacle? Now then, what is to be done with this person? For all must say, I am not with this person, and all must condemn them to not be with them, for they mock themselves, their own people, and they mock many things, and it is almost seeming support of those they start contention with, and yet do they not know that the people were not doing these things? Now then let them be stoned, or rather driven out, for it is not wrong, and the angel is not in Egypt, in a foreign nation, for let them be driven out, and you say, an angel does not have mercy to halt the crowd? But the angel is not in the foreign nation of Egypt, and says, the people, too, should not be in the foreign nation of Egypt anymore, for he loves Judah, the lions, and agrees with them.




To the Priest-King of Zion, from the angel of the covenant:

I would like very much for there to be something like the OJB translation of the Bible, for English speakers, where the words are left in Hebrew that cannot be translated into English, where there is no English word, and I considered, can there not be definitions of these things listed, and can it not be a thing even of technology, if it needs to be smaller, that the people can read it, for the translations we have in English, I believe all of them have failed me, and I search much for the definitions of things with the OJB and with other translations, and Young's Literal is sometimes deplorable. Now I am not able to do this thing, and I imagine there are some who have the heart to see this thing accomplished.




Now then I offer peace to Judah, the lions, for Sarmatia benifits from you, and Beelzebub the arragant is beneath your feet, indeed when you run at times your foot is on his head, and I have considered, the elite soldiers of Eretz Chadrack, they are regarded as being David, who are companions of angels, that two rivers are to Sarmatia, and three rivers if Judah will have peace and alliance to Sarmatia, and the Priest-King, the sun, will he not be in Eretz Chadrack, for America, because of the wars, cannot be acceptable for the Temple anymore, although is there another misty mountain in America, another Mount Zion? Now all such mountains are a Mount Zion. Now there has also been knowledge given by the bible of what should be at the site of each mount Zion, a shelter for people, for there is a shelter of the mountain, and so then a shelter built there, and it for security and threats and also for shelter from the rain, for it is a shelter from whirlwinds, being smaller attacks of soldiers, for thus is the tornado. Now it is not a thing of birds, but of storms, that whirlwinds come on foot without the sky at times. Now might there not be a time when soldiers of great ability, mighty, might only throw out the devil by their going into a place without speaking a word or raising a battle-bow? For they may be holy, these soldiers of Sarmatia, that some may achieve a further ability. Now then will Muslims not be having a river to Sarmatia, and David, and even Judah, if he wishes it, and Sarmatians are their own river themselves, and the river smites the land into order and integrity. Now then the Priest-King of Zion, I cut the tie, if there will be any, between him and the former administration of W. Bush, for the Priest-King is from Heaven, and they may not arise some day to be parasites to the whole of the Earth, for he is the Priest-King. Now such is life.




Now who is the spirit of Anne Frank? But you do not reason like a people without wisdom and knowledge in this thing, you who have said, is she a spirit that comes again, and even again in the future from now? But not Elijah? No, not Elijah, and her spirit is not mentioned in the Bible? But not Daniel, and there are Danielles, for you have said, yet she is not like the Danielles who we now might understand because of the books? But is she a prophet unto her people, and a wise woman, concerned for her people? Now she is with me, the angel, and she goes out from me, her, and she is with me, her, and she is found in places when I have written to the Hebrew Jews, and yet not when writing to other people, or about other people. Now then, associate of mine at times, oppose me where you must, for you must do the Lord's will, and it is good, and criticize the moons of Saturn, for you are having the right, and you are the Lord's. Now you are with Jerusalem, the Hebrew Jews, and not with Zion, and your name I do not give them. Now then from David comes forth a branch, from the house of Jessie comes forth a branch, and it has leaves upon it. Now a branch comes forth, and what is her name? Now does not the branch have the right to criticize the moons of Saturn? Now then branch of the Mountain of the daughter of Zion, hill of Jerusalem, you have been called Anne Frank, and what is your name, the name of the hill of Jerusalem? Now if you return again, and will even return again, you spirit, the hill of Jerusalem, yet the mountain of the daughter of Zion belongs to the Lord, and so does the hill of Jerusalem. Now you are also a branch, mentioned, and the King of Assyria has shaken his hand at you and I, and yet I have not known of it. Now then you are not a wife of mine, for they will no doubt question it, and not my daughter, nor my sister, for they will no doubt ask questions.




Now a tower has come, and Jacob has been in its realm, and a branch out of its roots, and it is the hill of Jerusalem. Now I am not mercury, and Venus does not come from me, but if there has been prophecy of the Lord, the Christ, and you do not have a prophecy as is in Isaiah, and I do not have this prophecy, yet I am not a prophet, but daughter of the Christ, daughter of Venus, are you? But you are not daughter of the Christ. But is there not a hill of Migdal Eder? Now the hill of Migdal Eder, the hill of Jerusalem, where is she found, and what is her area? Now does she not give light, at night, that some are having her domain, when they have it, that her sign changes hands? Now in the day is the light, and gives its light, and it is the truth given out from the king, from the wise men, from all those who give light and truth, and it is the day, and at night, there has been light still, to testify to the light of the sun, and this light was Anne Frank, for the days of the Lord are not the days of man, and indeed there was night upon the Earth at the time of her, at the time that the hill of Jerusalem shone upon Earth. Now the moon is the hill of Jerusalem, the hill of the daughter of Jerusalem.




Now Sarmatians, do not remove the forests as much as the farming people do, for if Sarmatians have farms, yet they leave more forest, for the land is forests, rivers, rocks upon the ground, large and smaller, and bon-fires, and if possible, there are even mountains. Now the horses there are, spears, and swords, and all the swift riders that do war, and the women who are warriors, they are with you, and these people are comparable to Muslims, and Muslims are not forgotten, for still there is no other people so much concerned with angels, that it is not making sense to try to say anything wrong in this way considering Muslims, for what can the foolishness even mean? But if there are rivers to Sarmatia, there are rivers and highways from Muslims to Sarmatia, and they have cities along the way. Now there can be no barrier along the way from them to the angel, for it is only a stumbling block of foolishness and ignorance. Now is the building of Sarmatia in this way not premature? Yet I have desired to write about it, because I liked it, and it was not there anymore, for Sarumata or Sarmatia, yet whose people was this, who had so much wisdom, for there is wisdom concealed in it, with what little they know.




Now Saturn has one-hundred-forty-six moons, and a new group of moons was discovered, and yet there are seven primary moons. Now they discovered sixty-two new moons after the original moons were discovered. Now the primary moons, are they not the primary of the different houses of moons, and I write of spiritual things. Now Anathoth is a name of Titan, and the moons do not have their right names. Now then who will find Anathoth, the true heir of her, for I cannot commit wrong in this thing, that they call the un-rightful heir the name of one of the primary moons, that I be as Jeraboam and say to the wrong heir, be having this high thing, and the true heir, yet who should even consider them, for I do what I want. Now I cannot be as Jeraboam in this thing, and so the moons, the primary if you will find them, will be women, virgins, and the true heirs.




Now I do not have the ability to find them, and I am saying, I must not be Jeraboam, who made unworthy men priests, to desecrate the holy, for the Heavens are pure, and the worthy must be given what they are given, for if they say, though I was not worthy, yet your sin is taken away, the Lord found chose you, that you were worthy, and I cannot sin in this way to give to the wrong person. Now does this mean there is burden placed upon them, after they were chosen? But will they be crushed for being good? Harassed not by the devil, but harassed by me? But such is like Gomorrah, and I do not do this sick evil to them, for they are not given harassment, not threat, but they are free, for it is not a thing of men, and Saturn does not rule over the solar system, for there are only five planets, and the moon is visible in the night sky, that these are the stars in the sky that are visible. Now there are then seven that are visible in the sky, whether at night or during the day. Now it is mercury, moses, venus, the Christ, Mars, the god of Zion, and the rest is known to you. Now then people, shun Jeraboam, do not be like him to desecrate what is holy, for it is a thing even of sicophants, worse the Jeraboam, to desecrate what is beautiful and sacred. Now two idols of the people have done good for me, and not bad, and yet let the idols be statues, for they have begun to make them idols in their way of speaking and thinking, that they should return to be statues, not things of groups of people, for this has never been required, even if they were called idols prior, yet they were not, and people praised them and admired them, but they did not include them in their consideration of groups of people. Now when idols are then accepted as truth, then it is bowing to idols, that you not accept what is not meant for truth and knowledge to be truth and knowledge. Now have any of the people bowed, as of yet? Now the Lord finds fault with even the angels, and the religious writings are not to be added to the scriptures of the Bible, to be made part of the Bible, but wisdom is offered. But the books are not equal to the Bible.




Now then wise men and women who are studying the Heavens, will you then know who the moons are, and what their groups are, for there are seven moons, and it is more valuable than silver or gold to those who desire wisdom.






































